Now trading away half our dynamic PK duo makes more sense..
Thank you, I will post part 2 soon. I guess my real problem is that it isn't that scary but I'm really glad you found it interesting :)
Even Usain Bolt has said that Ashton Eaton (Gold Medal Decathlete)  is probably the greatest athlete alive.
I figured out a specialization quite early on. We focus on supporting Drupal and WordPress for micro-businesses and small not-for-profits in the UK.  You're right that we could perhaps specialize further. When we first started, we used to do Drupal only and not many people had heard of it. Now there are lots of people doing the same thing.  I should definitely spend more time networking and that's probably my biggest lapse. We get so busy sometimes that I don't have the chance to connect with others to look for new business and this is what leads to the 'famines' after big projects.  This is why I was wondering if pay-per-lead services would be a viable option.
I'm SUPER late to this (a friend of mine linked me your AMA), while I absolutely love scented candles and all that, my husband REALLY doesn't like perfumes and scented things (something about chemicals and artificial stuff) so I haven't been able to get any since we married. I know you make your candles by hand (which is pretty awesome, I'll say), but what do you use to scent them?  I'd love to get a few for when some friends come over and maybe for my mother in law that also loves scented candles, but I'd like to convince the husband first of letting me try them :)
They do have a small point. I feel so lucky I was diagnosed with depression and got medication before I was a teenager. (I was 10 or so. I know that's young to be put on antidepressants, but I was suicidal and already showed signs of self harm.) If symptoms had shown themselves just a few years later they might have been passed off as "normal teenage reactions to hormones" or something similar, and I might have had to go through all my teen years feeling like everyone would be better off if I was dead. Teenagers can and do have feelings that have nothing to do with puberty.  But I'm talking about people who actually have a chemical imbalance that causes anxiety, depression, etc. If they think they have depression because they feel sad sometimes and have never actually seen a doc about it, they can go flush their heads in a toilet.
Hey, I'm just one guy. You're welcome to try to prove me wrong. We make far more money fixing problems than we do preventing them!
[They are bros](http://foolforfootball.files.wordpress.com/2013/06/marioandluigi.jpg)
Yes it's not as good as the PS+ offerings, but really, Live Gold has been in existence for ten years now? For ten years, no free games, and now there's free games they're now "a fucking ripoff".  Cool, let's just *not* have them.
Exactly this.  That's why I hate when people tell me "you're going to get no sleep!"  My body knows this.  It's already preparing me.  
Oh, I didn't realize you were both the OP *and* author! Very cool. I'd be interested in the process of getting licensed by the athletic commission for reffing and judging. And a profile of Bruce Buffer, of course.   Also, any sort of fighter walk-through of their pre-fight routine, all the way from getting to the event and up until they walk out. I wanna know what goes on in between.
Hmmm, bend at the waist and let me see what I have to work with ;)
&gt;Attachment to rank nationalism  I'm not quite sure what you mean.   &gt;glorification of masculine culture  I wouldn't say there's a glorification, it's a boys club. Same idea as a high school foot ball team.   &gt;and increased utilization of militarism/military assets  The police are a para military organization. What do you expect?  &gt;us vs. them (or "other")ethos   Those aren't ethos, those are toxic mindsets that commonly develop among the officers because of the nature of their work. 
shut up elder
It's called dry humping.
It does have a slight shadowing effect I believe. 
You always read stories like this and think you know the solution but you never quite understand how difficult it is until you're in it. Just happened to me and it was pretty damn hard.
Could you link to these. I would google search them, but I feel you didn't give me enough information to do that with.
I wouldn't find it funny either if you used a nose on a happy face you sent me.
I have a similar story. When I had dreads, I wore my hair in a bun to work, but buns tend to fall down easily so one day, I went to the bathroom to fix it. One of my extensions fell out when I pulled the elastic off and I didn't notice... About 2 hours later my coworker said she saw a piece of my hair in the bathroom, and I didn't have a chance to get it until a few hours later. It was gone, so I guess someone threw it away for me... 
I know, I bought the SNES for Halo 3. 
Do you have a lot of lag playing on a Mac? Mine's been really slow compared to how good the videos I've seen look.  EDIT: The update fixed it. Thanks German_Potato_Soup.
Tryn was only born to make this skin real
We all make dumbs sometimes /u/shaddow1, we all do.
I actually think this would be really fun :P
KMAC is a korean custom keyboard company.  Their keyboards are fully programmable and tend to be quite expensive.  This is their website:  http://kbdmod.com/index.html  If you want one over here you generally have to order from https://www.originativeco.com/ or buy from a group buy or a private seller.  They also come unassembled, so you have to solder it together yourself, or pay someone to do it for you.  I was lucky enough to get my hands on a KMAC mini from GH user Tsangan.  Here's the post I made about it:  http://www.reddit.com/r/MechanicalKeyboards/comments/1fm9rd/keyboard_had_arrived/  I'm still learning to use the keymapping program, but I can safely say it's the nicest board I've ever used.  
  **SingedWaffle**  Although I'm in Australia so playing hours may be awkward...  &amp;#12494;( &amp;#94;_&amp;#94;&amp;#12494;)   --------------------   Let me fix that for you (automated comment unflipper) [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/FIXES_YOUR_COMMENT/wiki)
I keep mine a VHS tape, i put it with all of the old tapes in my closet.  
I used to work for a homelessness organization. A couple things that aren't noted in the article:  * The 2009 numbers were altered from their initial publication. An error was discovered in how families recieving CalWORKs benefits were counted. What's interesting about this is... before the correction, 2011 would have represented an *increase*, not a *decrease* in homelessness. Meanwhile, the "decrease" reported in the official 2009 Homeless Count was smaller than touted, or perhaps nonexistent (I haven't gone back to check the 2007 numbers). This correction was not revealed until the 2011 Homeless Count was published, and it was not completely explained until people confused about why the 2009 count changed asked LAHSA for clarification.  * The Recovery Act of 2009 included funding for a program called the Homelessness Prevention and Rapid Rehousing Program (HPRP... don't ask me where the other R went). This was a highly cost-effective program, which also had demonstrated effectiveness in preventing or reducing homelessness. It was available to all people who were homeless or facing homelessness (but some organizations prioritized families). At an average cost, nationally, of $2,200 per family, hundreds of thousands of people were either stabilized in housing or re-housed within days or weeks of becoming homeless. Funding for that program ran out in late 2011 in Los Angeles (EDIT: no, it was August 2012 actually, though most of it was expended by January 2012). The local replacement, the Family Solutions Centers, are available ONLY to households with children, and just started up in late 2012 (EDIT: actually I think it was February 2013). The adult household version isn't expected to come online until late this year or early next year. (BTW, the veterans program they mentioned, SSVF [Supportive Services for Veteran Families], is modeled closely on HPRP.)  In other words... this is a completely predictable result of local slowness in implementing "what works". Mike Arnold, head of LAHSA and quoted in the article, has a long history of blaming service providers for being unable to turn sow's ears into silk purses, asking organizations to achieve 65% permanent housing placement with $20/day/person funding (for complete room and board, plus case management, hygiene supplies, and referrals to supportive services and housing placements. In less than 90 days).  Edit to add:   [The total number of homeless people](http://www.lahsa.org/homelesscount.asp) counted in Los Angeles County in the 2007 count was 73,702. The published 2009 count was 48,053. The published 2011 count was 51,340, but the 2009 count was revised in that publication to 52,931. With the revised numbers, that says there was a 28% year-over-year drop, rather than a 35% drop indicated by the original 2009 number.  Many service providers expressed extreme skepticism when the 2009 count was published; their experience didn't match a huge drop in demand. Also of note is that between the 2007 and 2009 counts, LAHSA switched consultants for the count... from a California-based organization to a UNC Chapel Hill group. Some folks supect that people on the East Coast are less likely to understand the nuances of Los Angeles demography and homelessness.
I agree with the EVGA sentiment, I make liberal use of their GPU management software.  However, I would prefer to keep the thermal paste, I've used MX4 before, and it's very safe to use. Those extra few degrees centigrade can mean a longer CPU lifetime and marginally better FPS for a syringe that costs $10 now, and is enough for multiple builds.  I didn't realize the 660 GTX had a nice promo deal at the moment, I might go with that card in stead of the 650 GTX Ti
Alright guys, the official subbreddit for stopping Pinata abuse is up and running  /r/stoppinataabuse
it was only on my third playthrough of t1 that i realzed i could lean.  i used to kind of hop out and back in and hope for the best.  leaning made things much much easier.  but also a lot more emersive.  
Yeah, this is more and more looking like the reason. He's probably just sick of doing Game Grumps and wants to do something more fulfilling. What, you've never worked a "dream job" that didn't turn out as peachy as you expected? Maybe he got tired of having to be bright and funny on command, maybe he got sick of constant backlash against them "not playing the game right" or whatever, fuck maybe he's just sick of doing the let's play format and wants to work on something more structured. He probably doesn't want to tell the fans that he's just tired of doing Game Grumps because, sadly, too many people would take it as a personal affront.
Plus-minus isn't all that great. For instance, that sentence could read   "...in 2010, he was ridiculously reliable, as evidenced by his plus-55."   And you'd be talking about Jeff Schultz.
Dude, at least say (NSFW) or something if you're gonna post stuff like that.
lol
I'd give you gold if I had any money. Fantastic description.
In a twisting sort of irony, I received an error while trying to go to that page.   &gt; 500 Internal Server Error  &gt; The server encountered an internal error or misconfiguration and was unable to complete your request.
Man, it took me so long to notice the pickle!
I've beaten RDR on hard without aim assist, I am a pretty top shot. I can also beat people who use aim assist in multiplayer.
would like an invite pls - will be at the chat channel  IGN: Izanagi (Muted, Desu~) 
Stealth douchery....I like it!
He didn't come out after his game yesterday :/ we looked everywhere and couldn't him or Reginald :c
That was intense, I got owned on my first Cthulhu eye and there was only one of them.
The old saying of "It's all in your head."  This is technically true since the brain processes everything hence everything in life is all in your head and yet we only tell crazy people that. 
Society already pressures people towards assuming heterosexual roles. Attempts to "turn" people work against that towards balance, and so no, aren't just as bad.
nevermind its over :[
[Your Shoe's Untied](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1Pluj9WjbY0)  My favorite.  "I don't wear shoes. I'm a dog"
Yes
evilswarm, I like all the XYZ monsters but new to the meta, and am nearly finished building wind ups
What godlike reaction lol? lissandra only had to spam R at the place where TF was going to ult, that's not hard.(not taking away credit that mancloud had a great game)
If you ported to WP8 you would have at least one sure player! 
and the should  be. it's time for a revolution, all over the world.
Getting the logs way in the back of the firebox helps ours to draw better. But even then, we have smoke smell in the morning.
Many banks offer student cards, which are designed to be first credit cards. You're typically preapproved with a valid Student ID and while the cards have very low credit limits, you can usually qualify for them pretty easily.
cute girl with playful looks i'd say.
They aren't clever, they're just a monopoly. 
There are always two sides to Scumbag Stacy.
I neither have the time nor the energy to downvote everything you have ever said.. just everything you said in this one thread.. because you are not contributing anything but your own vitriolic stupidity. 
resistance 1,2, and 3
Beauty balm cream. its that no-makeup makeup girls use.
*This message was automatically downvoted by a bot. lyk dis if u kry evrytim*
Here are the watches I wear:  http://i.imgur.com/l3zaKrO.jpg http://i.imgur.com/LEcIWVm.jpg http://i.imgur.com/nm4BT1H.jpg
I was told it was the Misa's Realistic Texture pack and that it was even listed in the description ...Didn't even notice it.
I liked Two Weeks, Chiron and A Song For The Hopeless. That's about it. 
A venerable sea of stupid.
My school showed these
Hahaha, Jesus, I remember those!   Yeah, I know I'd go to the poorhouse just trying to collect every single thing legal for me to have, and to get replicas to complete series if I let myself go.   'Representative' examples and novelties is what I want to limit myself to. 
How can you know they are bad teammates without playing the game with them? You base your claim completely off of champion select or recent games with him/her.
Acquire bitch coins. Get hatchback?
*"With pick No. 61 in the second round, the Caps have chosen center Zachary Sanford. #Caps dealt three picks (84, 114 and 127) to get him"* via Mike Vogel - 3rd, 4th, one of two 5th rounders they owned. Caps select next at 143
The thing that makes D/s relationships okay is _consent_. That the sub _chooses_ to give control to someone else.  That is a world away from this guy feeling that he has a "right" to own someone.
Stats for **[whatsanlp](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/search?q=author%3A%27whatsanlp%27&amp;restrict_sr=on)** on r/Loans   ---------------------------------------   **Requester Stats**   * [0 Loan(s) Requested](/req_) * [0 Loan(s) Paid Back By This Redditor](/paid_) * [0 Loan(s) NOT Paid Back By This Redditor](/unpaid_)   **Lender Stats**   * [9 Loan(s) Granted To Others](/offer_) * [8 Loan(s) Paid Back To This Redditor](/paid_) * [1 Loan(s) NOT Paid Back To This Redditor](/unpaid_)   ---------------------------------------   [joined: 1 year 3 weeks ago - total karma: 532](/meta_)   ---------------------------------------   [report link](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FLoans&amp;subject=cRedditBot%20Link%20Reported%20-%20http%3A%2F%2Fredd.it%2F1he64p) or [send feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=interwhos&amp;subject=cRedditBot%20Feedback!)   ---------------------------------------   [Want to start lending? Read this first!](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/comments/19y46n/meta_everything_i_can_think_of_to_give_a_first/)   ---------------------------------------   [Hi! I'm the cRedditBot. I'm here to help protect the lenders that make this place great. Please keep in mind that I AM a bot, so you won't get a response if you PM me.](/meta_)   ---------------------------------------
I don't know how any Baltimore fan couldn't love Ray Rice!
That's what I figured, but nothing else makes sense today so I wan't sure. 
I know alot of you will disagree with me but I really enjoyed how aggressive they were. They got in Spains face and they made Spain look disjointed. They just beat one of the best international sides in history by three clear goals. I don't care if it was ugly it worked.
also hair join kitchen culottes
Yeah. 
Is that a problem?
Does anyone else think his head looks really tiny in this picture?
That's it!
I could understand it. I'm writing a script for an artist as it is who only had it in such a setup xD
Yes, I did thought there was only 20 at first glance - i did not realize how full the cooler was.  Looking at the cooler a second time this week there were far more than 20 -- closer to 100
I chose all the easy missions early in the game so I was stuck with one that I thought would be easy but was incredibly difficult, long range downs.
I'm almost positive Miley Cyrus came out in the 1800s...
I'm on reddit quite a bit, and I only see them pop up occasionally.  what subreddit do you usually see them in?
It has to do with percentages. Movies starring women rarely do well. That's why they're anomalies. They're not anomalies because they star women. They're anomalies because they rarely do well. And vice versa for movies starring men.
I simply don't care. I'm not out to impress by pretending to be humble. I honestly am considered one of the best at my class in the U.S, and am known for it. I have over 50 people on btag who've added me for help with the class, and I've spent anywhere from 5 minutes to 3 hours helping each of them. The question was "what is top DPS." I listed mine, and why it was true. People don't like it, I simply don't care. The people who matter know of me, and those who don't matter are just that, they don't matter. I'm not going to waste time trying to make them happy, it has no point. I am good, it's easy enough for people to figure it out, but people don't like other's saying they are good. False humility is worse than open pride IMO, and it sure as hell ain't braggin if you can actually do it.  People care about looking good because of karma or shit. I'll content myself with actually being good and fuck what other people think.
She will most likely answer these questions tomorrow. I have to get her set up. She isn't familiar with reddit. 
You're quick to catch on!
Precious!!!! &lt;3
&gt;I graduated from college, and worked at a very high level in a job related to my major for better than a couple of decades   lol, Oh come on.  A "very high level job related to undergrad history"?  lol   &gt;Then I became an entrepreneur, and have owned and operated my own businesses since 1997. So not a liberal drop-out   And you married your hot model wife after you won the lottery!  Isn't that strange how successful anonymous internet people are?  &gt; However, I stated that my politics put me in a permanent position of choosing the lesser of two evils, and at this moment in time I have been forced by circumstances to generally (not fully) support Democratic positions in politics.   Yeah, dude, your radical left political positions are born out of pragmatism not ideology.   &gt; I give Elizabeth Warren a pass for the time being because she was an educator first  Here is this millionaire white women who somehow became the first "Native American" professor at Harvard has your blind loyalty, who's government bureau is collecting financial data on 5M Americans without their knowledge or consent.  Yeah, you're just some pragmatic centrist.   &gt;Just because someone disagrees with you does not make them simpletons or idiots.   Your shallow excuses and dubious claims do that.  &gt;Seriously, kid, you need to grow up.  The only way you can date me is that I wasn't born or too young to have known the political upheaval of the sixties.  That gives a range of nearly 60 years.   Speaking of silly speculation...
[Enjoy it again in gif form](http://i.minus.com/iby0jfRVQE6z1l.gif)  EDIT: I've just realised how fucking redundant this gif is. They're talking about the funny voice he's doing. It's a gif. You can't hear his fucking voice.
Amazing progress! On a side note:  marry me?
When someone's talking on their phone while 'ordering' I'll just draw a picture of a cellphone on their cup instead of a name. 
Yayyy for a whole division of mediocre teams!! Hopefully someone gets their shit together soon.
&gt;Not at all. What better way to change a system than from the inside?  By abandoning it and establishing a new one.  &gt;What do you suggest we do differently then?  First of all: Make police officers and soldiers *civilians in uniform*. Because that's what they are. Just people. They don't get any special rights nor any less, they only get the authority that comes with the badge that other people have to obey as dictated by law.   People shouldn't do what police officers say because they are police officers and you should do everything police officers say but because they have a badge and a uniform and these insignia symbolize the law (which is the only thing that should be followed).   I mean, even if a police officer busts into your home with his weapon drawn and yells "get your ass on the floor" that's already  unacceptable. It asserts authority through coercion rather than the law. In the US it has come so far that asking "Why?" rather than doing what the officer just told you will end with you getting tasered or shot or at the very least simply assaulted.  If a police officer shoots someone and it turns out that was a bad call, it's simply murder. If a police officer is shot then it's just murder. If a police officer provides his testimony in court, it's worth just as much as anyone else's.   If a police officer doesn't identify himself clearly with a badge and a number always visible on his back as well as his chest, no authority should be assumed. If you are unarmed and detained the police officer detaining you must be able to explain to you why he is detaining you otherwise you should be free to go and you should be able to sue the officer in question.  Using weapons able to apply deadly force or even "just" tasers or pepperspray should be an absolutely last resort used only if there is due reason to assume there is immediate threat to health and/or property.  Secondly: Hand out immediate and draconian punishment for abusing authority in any way whatsoever.  In countries like Germany you can usually assume there will always be a full investigation for a police officer just *firing* a weapon (without even hitting anyone). In the US the police kills people on a daily basis and no bother even asking questions.  &gt; I'm saying that people who want to join and do good and change things for the better shouldn't be discouraged by people like you saying that they are just delusional.  No, they don't change anything for the better. They are just doing their job the way it should be done anyway. That there are many people that don't do it that way is the problem.   &gt; You're implying that there will most likely have to be a period of anarchy.  Yes. Your point? The point is revolution. Which is long overdue in the US. Often that comes with short periods of anarchy. 
This is probably not the best idea to discourage people from using ABP. Those who have it on won't see it, those who don't know about it might get curious and download it.. Only those who have it but already have an exception for reddit will be 'rewarded', but then you are preaching to the choir.
Very true. 
What if all books that contain world records concerning themselves are disqualified from the competition for the book with the most world records?  Will the Guinnes book then list itself or not? 
Java and C# programming is my jam. I'm doing PHP this summer and it feels so weird. 
IQ test
Ok, lets try and get this thread going somewhere.  *knock knock* Me: *[opens door]* "Hello, who are you and why are you here?" You:"..."  What do you say?
Pretty much exactly what I am IRL- a 2nd degree brown belt in Kenpo Karate- but with better parkour. 
You might say that I have the balls, yes.
Do your faction's Landfall questline, and then the Isle of Thunder. You don't need all this though, so if you want to just progress asap just do hc's until you get 460 ilvl and do LFR until you can go into actual raids on normal and higher difficulty.
Yeah I've got to agree there's nothing like putting down all other games that try too hard and playing a game of Mario Kart or a bit of Pokemon every so often. There we are, the perfect example of colour use. Pokemon games love colours. I'll also point out music. It definitely plays a massive part of games, and changes the experience. As I said before with the games that are trying to hard to be gritty, you can tell also from the music they use, it seems to be way over the top orchestral sort of music, whereas the true dark games centered around story know exactly how to use dark music. Same as how Mario and Pokemon are known for there cheery music.
**[guitarrr](http://para.ms/reus/guitarrr)**: [^^original ^^reddit ^^link](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/1he0ee/a/catg7b6/?catfkwo)  Apparently the Heavy Robot from TF2's MVM game mode. 
Apocalypse Now.
On top of what's already being said, he's always hurt. 
Ha! Joke's on you! I participate in this thing called Belegarth.  Unlike that piece of steel you got there I can hit people with mine.
If you shit on the sofa, you can wipe your ass easily by scooting forward.
I might be a little late to the party, but is this it? http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CV5xEC71mdg
It was a term developed in Oxford early last century to differentiate between 'association football' and 'rugby football', personally i am not too fussed by it but i too prefer to refer it as football due to familiarity.
Hope they give it the same ROF as the Church3.
Mt. Tahoma?
It isn't absurd actually.  There's a reason why games are going up and up in price - Because they aren't ever going to be made again.  What's left it what's left.  It was a rare game at the time and even rarer today.  There's a bunch of other games that are more expensive than 200 as well.  Although 200 for EVO is on the pricier side, I can see it go for 150 for the cart, that sounds a bit more fair.
OP, have you ever played the Roma Surrectum II mod for RTW?
Irish lad from Ireland.. I feel your pain and appreciate your win
http://sketchbookclub.com/wp-content/uploads/2006/06/try_and_stop_us-1.jpg
Ok, I'm fresh out of tinfoil hats, so idiocy like this is something I won't waste my time on.
Jiffy! 0:02-0:15
I was taught about it two months after my fifth birthday, and I like to think it's made me a more balanced person who is comfortable with mortality. Death wasn't something that surprised me when I was a teen, it was something I always knew was going to be a part of life and that it was completely and utterly normal. In fact, it's the most normal thing possible, every single thing experiences it. It's the only thing we have in common with virtually every thing.   I plan on teaching my future kids this as early as possible, and as early as I feel they can handle it. 
Voodoo. Vince and spongebob the movie are two great ones
No particular reason. I am sure he is a great guy though.
**OLD NEWS**
TIL: Craigslist
This is the funniest thing on Reddit today.
Love the song as you might be able to tell from my flair lol.  Its like a melodeath song with the attitude of thrash and lyrics of straight death metal. Just like on stirring seas, it paints a vivid picture but this time of some serial killer maniac hidden away somewhere getting off to his Own personal art of mutilation.
Go with As Monaco FC!!
14-20 were always the hardest for me as well. Relapsed 3 or 4 times this year around that time. Now I'm more confident than ever that I'm set for 90 days and beyond. Push through, and don't succumb to binging if you relapse but get right back on it.   The BEST advice I heard was to not think about the badge. Just do "today I will not fap" and you'll be amazed how far you get.
Is Bat Boy old enough to meet the Constitutional age requirement, though?
You were saying?
I wish my dog could be vacuumed. I have friends who vacuum their dogs, and the dogs love it. My dog will start running as soon as I open the closet I keep the vacuum in.
Lies! you're not old; *older* perhaps but not old. :P (yeah I snuck a peek at your posts.) If you're "old" I must be ancient then :c
&gt; It extends further  You didn't need all those extra words. The first three were enough.  Apology accepted.
Do you have a link? I wasn't aware of that
Stolen stuff
And you don't know Justin Timberlake's fan base, you child.  You're basing your opinion off of observations.  I've observed that you are a pretentious douche...there for it must be true. 
Supra engines are renowned for their bulletproof-ness. You can do some pretty amazing things with twin turbos and a block that won't give.
What were you hoping to modify and distribute? If it's models or textures, I can't help you there; I'm allowed to use them under condition that I not allow redistribution. If it's the plugin, I may be able to add the feature (or you could "distribute" me the source code for the patch).
nicely done sir
&gt; ‘‘Being a father was an honour and a privilege that amounted to the best ~~six~~ *sex* years of my life,’’ the American-born Newton, 42, told the court.  Fixed That For Him.  40 years is not nearly enough.
Do people really take that into so much consideration?
I really wish there was.  Until then, I guess I'll just douche away
His voice reminds me of Rob Swire's a wee bit. I have no problems with this.
[Post](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/1hd4vz/monsters_u_monsters_inc_one_terrifying_film/)  [OP](http://www.reddit.com/user/RevWaldo)
I said it before and will say it again, Felipão is our MVP of the competition. The difference between his and Mano's team is unbelievable. He's a goddamn wizard.
It seems like the only thing he is good at is being tall. We need skill, damn it!
I don't think the fuck was in any way holy. 
Rich, old, white, guys. 
I promise, as an Oklahoman, we all aren't like this. 
Yes MrBelmont you did.   However many people here downvote you simply because you are you; despite the better title and qualifying comment you left. Have you considered making a second account for things like that? Post your unpopular (and usually completely reasonable) comments with MrBelmont and post objective news on another account? 
KMAC 2 &lt;3
I dont know how I feel about bickell and franzen on the same line
What is your view on knives, multitools, glues and other similar tools? It seems like it's always a "YMMV" kind of issue. I don't see much use for a knife. But scissors and glue are things I've heard used before.
Oh I see, thank you.  Yeah, I thought Xavi was going to step up. Possible moral being low for him or anyone else?
nope [](/hasanyonereallybeenfarevenasdecidedtouseevengowanttodolookmorelike)
Every approved recipe I've seen for home canning homemade mustard says that it must be hot when it goes into the jars. My guess would be that you're meant to can it while it's hot instead of letting it settle and then refrigerating. 
Mine too.  These were some really calm, patient ladies, but she handled a few frames, and I was waiting for the smash-sting-cry that would have brought a bad ending to a great day.  Didn't happen, though, and she is stoked on honey bees! 
***Pub***  ----  Sure!
For which I am very grateful.
Definitely apologize. Even if she doesn't forgive you or want to be friends again, you made a mistake so you should own up to it. She'll most likely be grateful to hear it.
not a better player, but he fits the bulls better than LMA would. Also, the trade is not that good for either team if noah is a part of it. Portland will go into a huge rebuild if we lose LMA with no reason to want a defensive center and LaMarcus wouldn't be nearly as good without Joakim.
This is why I need a travel partner. 
There are definitely import restrictions of some types of tonewoods (rosewood is a great example), so your guitar may be under some form of governmental control. 
This is my point. They never tell you they are going to drug test, but they do. If you give a urine sample, they will test to see what drugs are in your system just to rule it out. They have never said anything to me about testing for drugs. It's always "something else".
his own fault, if he didnt even attempt to ask you for it to be given back, then its yours to keep i guess :p
And the killed by the king. And nobody cared because she was a whore.
1999 mode? What's that?
Take it to court, this guy is gonna find out real quick what our justice system thinks of dads like this
Well I mean they USUALLY right themselves with their tails. I guess there might be some situations where they can't...
World War Z...  1) The ending without a cure, but with a "camouflage" so humans can fight back.  Perfect blend between optimism and "the fight continues." 2) The global scale of everything. 3) It's not idiocy that does people in like in normal zombie flicks, but a literal wave of zombies pouring towards you.  It adds a feeling of helplessness, while in other zombie movies you watch Everyday Joe start slap-chopping with a chainsaw.  TL;DR: World War Z, because globalness (is that a word?) and fucking terrifying fast zombies.
It's not that they see anything, it's that RB is a weak link for Spain (Until Montoya breaks through, that is). Honesty, I think Arbeloa is marginally better/equal to Azpilicueta, so they just go with him.
after reading the theory I'm pretty supportive of Zoro's Shusui eating it. He said he always wanted a flame sword. and there's been a lot of discussion about this sword in the manga recently. would be awesome.
Caught on the Island side of the fill on a red flecked watermelon Gary. 
Muhahaha! You may have won Brazil, but Spain got something even better! They got a golden boot. Correction, Torres GOT THE GOLDEN BOOT.
Op sounds like attention whore. IMHO should be safe. pack it like a CIG and don't look 11. Good luck
Am I the only one that sees a Cabbage Patch kid?
They'll all be fat snipers.
Alright, this is probably the best Travis and Doublelift interivew yet. I could not stop laughing hahaha
Glad to hear that. I hope I have the same success. 
There really isn't any correlation at all.
violence
I find this extremely funny, since me and OP are on a skype call expecting some white knights like you to pop, :O. But hey, he's really glad you're standing up for him! &lt;3
You should try it on Survivor.
Positives for Barca:  Neymar and Alves were the best players on the pitch  Pedro was Spain's best player  Didn't think Xavi and Busi played badly they were just let down by Mata and Torres.  Ramos and Arbeloa were shocking and Marcelo gave away a penalty xD
Remember that time America became Russia?
I was about to suggest buggr but that sounds more like it should be run by the nsa
I get the reference but induction ranges boil water extremely quickly. Induction ranges didn't exist when the movie came out so it was valid for him to say that though.
Tell me more how dams capture water when it doesn't rain.
That makes perfect sense, and I agree with you. I could also stand to rephrase my point. I suppose that I'm concerned with the whole low-salt movement, in a similar way as I'm concerned with the gluten-free movement. If you don't have celiac disease, you can eat gluten. Of course there is probably some amount of gluten that would be considered "too much", but it's not something to worry about. If you don't have high blood pressure and heart problems, you can eat salt. Of course there is probably some amount of salt that is considered "too much", but it's not something to worry about. Sure, you should monitor how much salt you eat, but you should also monitor how many calories you eat. That doesn't mean calories are in any way "bad for you." 
It could be argued that a country spying on its own citizens is not *as bad* as a country spying on another country.
Good ole Kingwood, Texas
This is completely fucked up.  Amerika has damn sure changed.
I'm so flattered...more so than the girl I said it to. 
A laptop DC power supply.  These usually output 14-16V at a max of 3-4A. Edit:  good luck.. post your result!
If all else fails, there's always the [Jenna Marbles face](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8wRXa971Xw0).
Look, I know this is a gross analogy, but if your grandmother offered you sex would you say "At least I'm getting laid?" That's how I feel about the PUAs. They are not an option for any kind of sexual satisfaction. I don't want someone who writes FRs about number closes anywhere near me.  Their attitudes toward other people are horrifying. They are not an option.   So sure, when I go out in public I often meet men who approach to say things like "You smell great!" But if you google that phrase (it's a common PUA thing) and read the things these men say about the women they approach, I think you'll understand why I literally do not consider these men to be any source of anything I would ever want. At all. Ever. 
The only concern I ever have with green anaconda's is providing a water source. I was concerned when I read the description and more concerned when I saw the pics. I read your responses and I could not agree with you more. Providing a natural environment for snakes means providing the things the snake looks for in the wild. No matter how naturalistic you think  your setup is its not natural unless it has flora and fauna other than the snake. Getting the right flora and fauna in the right balance and keeping that balance is next to impossible. Snakes want to feel secure. For a ball python that's tight fitting hides and cover. For a green tree python that's a perch. For a green anaconda that's access to water. That animal looks incredible, you have to be doing something right and from your words I am confident you have this under control, not that you need my or anyone else's approval. 
Mhe I usually say what I want to say regardless of karma but sometimes I just avoid it to avoid the annoying ass replies that I think are ludicrous at times.
Morgan Freeman. That IAMA made me so sad =(
My mum went to Gatlinburg, TN and absolutely loved it. She said there was a ton of stuff to do. 
Pfft, rich beats any other privilege hands down every day of the week.
Well, I think it does harm them/us, but you know.
They have gone down after most of the recent earnings reports, but by the analyst prediction and not Apple's.  So according to their analysis they are doing fine, although they were originally using the under report/over deliver strat. I do not use options to hedge myself because I use cost averaging instead, and this is where my money goes.  Looking back I could have made some money due to put options, but it is not considerable considering the price points I have bought in at, plus I would have had to repatrated the dividends. 
Yeah maybe. The military puts all new recruits through training warning us about the dangers of these types of places.
shrug. oddness.
Height gives you a great advantage in observation. Depressed people will keep their head down but still lift it to look at people passing by. Since they have to look much higher at me I can spot them and make direct eye contact with them while to others it might look like they are just looking in their general direction and will ignore acknowledgement.
You don't understand phones, is what you mean, apparently.
Hey Phil, what if I told you that you don't coach the Lakers anymore.  Phil is a legend, but am I the only one that thinks he has been a huge annoyance all season with his comments? You're the one that retired, dude. You've been approached by multiple franchises with blank checks since wanting to come back to the league. You've turned them all down in hopes that you can bully your way back to LA.
There's some obvious decision making points that can come up in games. Things that come to mind are you just defended a push, you just killed a base, or you just attacked and traded well with his army.  Stop and take note of where you are for a second or two. Often the decision will be quite clear based on what has happened.  ---  You just killed a base, or held his pressure after being a base up - "I need to deny his future bases, because I'm one base up NOW" - Time to macro up and stay safe with strong information!   You can choose to attack with the remaining units you used to defend, if you wish. Another decision that can come from this is "I've pressured with the leftover units I used to defend, and I did lots of damage!" - This could be a time to continue your aggression. Something that comes to mind is a 12 Roach opener vs Terran, maybe you do enough damage to crush him if you reinforce with Roaches. Often you would want to transition into a macro game, but your information tells you that you can reinforce and win.  You just traded with his army nicely - "I need to tech switch as he doesn't have an answer for my current tech (I have Hydras vs DT opener, he needs to add Colossi so I can add Mutas)" - Time to take another base, add tech and attack shortly!  ---  I don't think I answered everything fully, but if you have any further questions feel free to ask here or on EU at Stark.1785!
Wait, they let you upgrade the medium popcorn to a large popcorn? I didn't know you could do that. Next time I go I'm gonna check.
They're already 3 down.
Nice!
Well, at least they made sure to make the last one count!
It is a problem with ender storage (chests or tanks), with a chunkloader and a quarry in the same chunk in the twilight forest. Ender storage is also known to cause chunk resets in other locations as well (we lost 5 chunks in the overworld, and the only linking factor was that every chunk contained 1 or more enderchests).
Because no one in PR understands a damn thing about something that technical.
I've got to give up now. It's 1 AM over here and I'm knackered and ill. Thanks for the offer though and I hope you manage to fix it soon. Good luck
But you only see those types of hats with utility dress. Garrison caps, service caps, and berets are used with service dress with is what this is aiming for. That's why I'm a bit meh about using one of them.
I would upvote that for reptile creativity's sake!
I love Happy Wars. Sad that so few people know about this free-to-play multiplayer gem.
Yeah! it was really cool!
I think this might happen to Arya. I don't have any proof of it, but I have a weird feeling that she will be sent to kill Alayne Stone, but will snap out of it when she realizes it's actually Sansa (who won't recognize Arya b/c of her face). How or why she goes about it is anyone's guess.
Every Leafs fan would love another Domi in the blue and white.
It is as easy as it looks. That is not an imgur photo album link (they are also easy to create). It is, literally, just a series of image identifiers in a comma-separated list.
There's hair in this picture?
in fairness, the Frozen Tomb is not a skillshot.. you literally can't mess it up on the zhonya's bait. If he doesn't zhonya, you nail him. If he zhonya's, you can't even 'miss it' you just nail him as soon as he becomes targetable again
Ya. I've found quitting very difficult. But I've switched to ecigs 
I'll do this for you.  I promise.  I love you.  pls respond.  i'm cute i swear.
I think the ambiguity exists around the term 'American explorers.'  Are they using it to define him as a explorer who was American, or are they just trying to say that he was an explorer of America (North/Central America in this case. Or did he also explore as far as South America?). 
Holy Hell. It's like $5-7 for a baby loaf (2 lbs. if I am not mistaken) in every grocery store here.
4,322 retweets....REALLY? I'll just comment on how America and Canada are the same country
No you are the worst individual ever, you fucking racist piece of shit.
You've posted this like 3 times in an hour? Or am i just seeing doubles / triples?
While not impossible, that's highly unlikely. What's more probable is that it formed in the Sun's accretion disk, and had its orbit perturbed by some other body (eg. passing star)
I haven't read all the comments, but I haven't seen Symphony X mentioned yet, so....my recommendation would be start with Paradise Lost or Iconoclast, no other metal can compare (in my opinion, of course).
Ohm Gul
Steven. He's so chill.
Definitely interested in some more clothing drops. Boots, belts, high quality boxers, and outer-ware. 
Can you describe the man some more?
Just at a curiosity, did you watch Taste Some Jams by Mitchell Davis? 
Thank you. I wish you luck and peace as well.  
I would have just asked for a copy and fixed all the grammatical errors. Then, I would proceed to "accidentally" spill my drink all over the table and rip the page into little bits. I'm embarrassed to call myself an American after this..  
Actually, "in god we trust" was on coins long before 1956.  Edit: not that there is anything right with that
Yes, it was -- which was why it was removed shortly after. I'll get a picture of the wall in its current state next time I'm around that area.
Can't, sorry.
Glad I could help, they're kinda confusingly named! I bought a set of green WASD keys from them for my Black Widow Ultimate and they look quite nice I think, it adds some personality. 
His own worse enemy is himself. 
Many of them are relating to exactly the same issue - it's not my fault there's a tremendous amount of redundancy in the questions asked by OKC.  Beyond that, I'm pretty satisfied with how my matches have been working out for me - people who get below 90 are people who I actually don't get along with very well, whereas all of my exes who are on OKC are 99% matches with me (and no, I did not meet them all there either). I happen to like and get along best with people who are very, very similar to myself and how I've answered my questions seems to reflect this.   Plus, you have absolutely no idea how many questions I've even answered. If I was complaining, it would be one thing - but I'm not. 
I think Jewish food and culture is much more homogeneous than Muslim food and culture. Foods vary widely just within the middle east, let alone, between and within Iran, India, Afganistan, Pakistan, Indonesia, Kazakstan, Indonesia, and Malaysia, etc... 
you sound that you're really you.. awesome,
lu2 derpy derp ;D * * *
No she wasn't.
If you bring back those four and let Smith walk, you will likely only be able to sign one of the two unless they are both willing to play for ~ 4 year 42MM contracts.
[Selection by lottery/sortition](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sortition#Ancient_Athens) + [trimvirate](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Triumvirate) = ???
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HcCQsJ_Z3-E
They aren't in stock housings, [they're D2S projectors](https://fbcdn-sphotos-a-a.akamaihd.net/hphotos-ak-prn2/1049187_10151675970632332_1395718908_o.jpg). **The image was altered**, they don't dazzle other drivers from behind or from the other size of the road. Y'all can stop with the downvotes now, :P.  HIDs in stock housings are a huge peeve of mine as well.
I guess that would be a no.
Ever seen Ricky Alvares?
I'm spanish and I agree. Best thing that could happen to us.  Last time was US that beat us in the Conf.Cup.
This anime is really good. I tell all my friends about it and even the ones who don't like baseball love it. The hook comes in the very first episode, and trust me, it's a killer.
A thousand dollars is just too low when thinking about it. Like if someone came up and told you that you had a chance at a million dollars, and it'll only cost you a thousand dollars if you're wrong (assuming your chances are at worst 50/50), I don't see anyone who wouldn't take that chance. The return is just insane.   If it was more than a thousand, like a hundred thousand, then you'll see people being much more split on the issue, or maybe not even a hundred thousand, maybe even 25,000, or something. And while I can understand the reasoning to take both (because it's safe), I don't agree with it.
i count three fucks in that statement. I don't care what race you are, nor was this originally about what mine is.  Until you can at least acknowledge the points I made about the Schneider trade, you're just wasting my time.  fuck fuck fuck fuck fuck. 
You could make it in Django or with Java and Jetty in almost no time, or probably with anything else.  If you have to ask, you should probably just stick to what languages you already know.
Legalizing drugs/gambling/prostitution is a crime cartel's worst nightmare. They likely wouldn't be able to stay in business.
I agree with most of what you have to say, except, the theme song. A little too soft rock for a sci-fi show IMO. I skip over it now but when I watched the  show on it's first run that song really galled me. I liked the emphasis on the Vulcan and Andorian conflict. Also some of the actors/actresses were way hot. Enterprise had a better looking crew by far than the other series.
what am i even looking at?
I'm not entirely sure why but the pure simplicity of this post just makes it one of my favorite, if not my very favorite, reddit post i've ever seen
http://www.paradoxplaza.com/
Thanks! I do own Saints Row the Third, I'm gonna look into this. At least it's something.
Ask her to marry you... and get a prenup.
This episode made me laugh multiple times. Good stuff. 
&gt; most people aren't smart enough to figure out what they like on their own  DING DING DING WE HAVE A WINNAR
YouTube mirror for mobile users: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vruo_lqCJ5Y
Bilo je super. Dosta indikativno da je to najmanje čobanski događaj na kojem sam prisustvovao na tom trgu.  Produkcija je bila jako dobra iako nisam shvatio stunt s EU zastavom, govori su bili brzi i solidni, čak je i Milanović dobio solidan pljesak, naročito na spomen antifašizma. Malo smo kolektivno zaboravili gdje su svoje uspjehe ostvarili Tesla, Andrić, Prelog i Ružička, dosta se spominjala regija i pomoć susjedima itd itd.  Zabavni su bili filmići s tim razlikama u dijalektima i regijama, citirana poezija, fokus na promicanje znanosti. Sve u svemo lijepo.
No. Itd be based on the fact that you pooped
LOL. One would think that would have been there in the first place. :-P
This would be great for LCS. :D
Vem är James?
Ever read the Channel3000 comments? Holy shit people are anal.
Well, it *is* called Maryland Deathfest, not Maryland Healthfest
I mean it in a very good way; though it is true we still have a *long* way to go, and there are a *lot* of bumps and rough spots on the road, today is, on the whole, a better day than any previous day in history, and tomorrow will be even better. 
I honestly am. I'm wanting to sell my trans am and get a fun porsche to drive around on the weekends. I don't want to pay a ton of money though. 
The content is **very** vague. If it were not for the title, it would be indistinguishable.
Biking! I forgot about that lol. I'd think of it as a blessing. Take an ice bath/shower to kill a haze hitting you, clean up a bit, watch a movie that doesn't really have women you consider pretty or gorgeous, surround yourself with friends, etc.. Their is plenty you could do.  I personally think ice bath is by far the best, especially if you are sore or exhausted. Good luck!
nice rafleee
when you cover a tattoo, it generally has to be done with darker ink, tattooing it with skin color ink will make it more "pale" looking though. but then it would look worse like a weird birthmark scar thing
I would've kicked it in the face
Eh, I just think it's human nature to talk shit anyway, more so if you think no one can understand you.
[](/psychiatwi)It's not exceptionally difficult, but most riddles aren't too hard. The point is to solve them. Sure, I could spend thirty minutes crafting one that requires master's degrees in physics and Elizabethan fashion to solve, but then no one would get it. Most riddles are short, sweet, and hard to solve only if you try to think at them linearly and don't pay attention to *exactly* what the riddler asked.
 Nice picture! :) Portland Headlight.... I recently became interested in this lighthouse, I painted a picture of it last summer... My first landscape painting ever... http://i.imgur.com/Rf95UYq.jpg
This is fucking brilliant
Sir Richard Branson immediately comes to mind not only is he successful - he is a visionary leader.
Mind blowing
Yes I'm a lay person. But I have a right to opinions about the law and what is appropriate and what is not. What I don't see from the actual lawyers in /r/law is any attempt to actual make the great arguments you describe.   What is the legal principle that you think is relevant to that gag order? The media is still going to cover the case, it will still be "tried in the press." The press articles include quotes made by the defendent prior to the intial ruling that he could not use a nullification/first amendment defense, so the risk that the jury is contaminated by the media coverage seems unchanged. I don't see any good compelling reason for that gag order, and nobody has stepped forward to offer a compelling reason.  The problem with these posting seems to have much less to do with the lay-person making the postings than it does with the contemptuous reaction of many lawyers in their responses.
20 years is pretty recent considering we've being doing math for well over 2000 years
Kik me @ sonnyramirez1  Hope to hear from you :)
The MC1210 has support for offsets, so you don't need to just have it at the sign. The last line is quantity=x:y:z offset.  And with the sounds, sorry.. But thats the way minecraft currently works.. I am not sure if the particle packet in 1.5 allows for those particles without the sounds, but I assume it does. When bukkit adds support for the particle packet I'll be converting that IC to use that instead.
Feel free to add me guys. My play time is very irregular but you can hit me up whenever you see me online.
http://i.imgur.com/DEoQC.gif
Spice (Dune)
[Seems legit.](http://gifrific.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/09/Jennifer-Lawrence-ok-thumbs-up.gif) 
&gt;Throughout the semester, the classes Ms. X taught really bonded with her. Since this was her first teaching gig she decided it would be a good idea to throw a sort of cookout/going away party at her house. Some students came, including me, along with other teachers and faculty members and even the original spanish teacher with her baby. We ate burgers and brats and drank soda and it was all very formal and schoolish.   wow, yeah, that wouldn't be allowed here at all.
I was 17 when I moved out of my Mother's house (long sad sob story that deals with her boyfriend being an abuser.) I didn't legally emancipate, I just demanded my dad's SSI (I was getting death benefit,) and moved into a boarding house.  When I went to enroll back at the high school (I had moved school districts) The Princpal told me he couldn't technically enroll me without my Mother's signature. He listened to my story, and enrolled me anyway.
How much would you pay for a pair of Archetypes laced to formula hubs?
Roll that IRA into a Roth IRA.
Hence the "pulling" instead of has pulled. I think it's gonna happen, it's a lot of pressure and everyone's improving at a rapid rate with taking down Cloud 9 on their minds. 
Ε ρε μια μανία που έχει το reddit με την απόλυτη κυριολεξία.   Προφανώς και δεν παίρνεις διαβατήριο μόλις βγεις από το μαιευτήριο, αλλά την εγγύηση ότι στα 18 σου δεν θα μείνεις stateless. Στις πιο πολλές χώρες. Εδώ στην λεκάνη της μεσογείου  δεν έχουμε πρόβλημα με το να απελαύνουμε άτομα που μόλις τελειώσαν το λύκειο "πίσω την Νιγηρία" (και σε πολλές χώρες της Αφρικής η υπηκοότητα δίνεται μόνο από πατέρα σε παιδί. Η μάνα δεν μπορεί να δώσει την όποια αφρικανική της υπηκοότητα, το παιδί δεν μπορεί να πάρει ούτε και την ελληνική, ωραία πράγματα).  Αυτό που μου δείχνεις είναι το neutralisation process για τους μετανάστες. Αν γεννηθείς σε καναδικό έδαφος, εκτός αν είσαι τέκνο διπλωμάτη, δικαιούσαι την υπηκοότητα.
If the computer is a "gray market" computer, it will be ineligible for AppleCare. This would include a machine that was manufactured for an overseas market (e.g., a Chinese model, when you're in the United States) which happens fairly often on ebay. If the machine was purchased and registered by another person (e.g., if John Smith purchased it directly from the Apple Store, or if Mary Jones registered the computer under her Apple ID) then you would not be able to register AppleCare.  As for the one year warranty service, it can be declined if it's a gray market machine.
Dude... the wood comment.  So true.
Who is that? She looks familiar..
Can velociraptors open doors?
Ah, damnit.
I do find this direction rather bizarre.  
I have this attachment, here are my feelings: it's a great idea, though it is slightly more of a hassle to load up than the standard stems. You have to cut a straw to the right length &amp; fit it tightly on the adapter stem, and you'll want to change straws fairly regularly, especially if using clear ones. And every time you need to load it up again or turn it off or whatever, you must remove the lid to the soda, then carefully take out the Solo.   But that isn't to say it doesn't come in handy, one of my best times with the Solo was whilst hiking with a friend, vaping from the thing in the soda adapter. We even had a container that fit alongside the Solo in the cup, making it super easy to load up new bowls. Suffice to say we used up a full charge that day, and vaped a hell of a lot of weed to boot.   Mind you, it does look strange to others who see you take a long sip of soda and blow out vapor. If you do end up getting one, prepare yourself for the endless "yo want some soda? ;)" jokes among friends
I like to listen to let's talk about cars by the butthole surfers. 
That'll buff right out.
I read a short synapse on wikipedia, but this is shorter and makes more sense. Sounds awesome! I might pick this up when I get cash!
So I says to Mable, 
The MtG community is very big, I assure you that there's a huge number of fans for every guild.   Golgari has the luxury of owning a broken mechanic that's big in some of the crazier formats, while guilds like the Simic and Izzet can draw people who can identify with their wacky creative antics. This tends to leave them with interest in discussion, for good synergies or just plain arts n' crafts, even despite this subreddit's normally kneejerk hate for the latter.  Boros and Orzhov, while ^ahem *thoroughly respectable and honorable* guilds, there's just little in the way of new or relevant content for them to discuss.
Annoyed me that they completely CGI'd Manu Bennets mocap. The dude is fucking awesome and if you watch the Behind the Scenes of his motion capture he was brilliant. 
:) 
*Without breaking eye contact with Frasier, James whips his cane back and snags the bandana off right before the gear smashes through the embedded rod. The bandana hangs at the tip of James's cane and he holds it outstretched towards Frasier, as if daring him to try to take it.*   I was born far from yesterday. Feel free to use your Fullbring, but know that you **will** endure a healthy amount of pain before you grasp this cloth.   ####When his weapon is drawn, James is trying to kill. But he's teaching a lesson now, so no, he is not aiming to take Frasier's life.
my bad, misread that article. UK intelligence budget is £2.3 billion in 2010 - 2011 financial year. https://www.sis.gov.uk/about-us/legislation-and-accountability/funding-and-financial-controls.html   Germany: The annual budget of the BND (CIA equivalent) for 2009 was €460,000,000.   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bundesnachrichtendienst France, the DGES  budget 2009: EUR 543.8 million, plus 48.9 million in special funds. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Direction_g%C3%A9n%C3%A9rale_de_la_s%C3%A9curit%C3%A9_ext%C3%A9rieure#Budget no data on china and russia tho.
Get Metal Gear Solid 3.  if you can, get MGS2.  controls are a bit more wonky though.  
Austin, TX is pretty cool and fairly inexpensive.  If you're into night life, sixth street is a must.  Also, tons of live music in the city, you can usually find some pretty well known bands.  If you're more into the outdoors, there's places like Barton springs.  Inner space caverns is just a little north and it's a really cool cave system.
Why not arma 2 CO, a lot more people probably have it.
I **am** an adult.
It IS music, but in the most primitive form.  Anything is music.  That's what Cage was trying to get across.  It isn't total silence.  It's what you, the listener can hear.  Your fan running, the car engine if you're driving, your computer.  What I didn't see the point in was the fact I would have to pay $0.99 for it when I can easily shut off the iPod for said amount of time and experience it that way.
Looks like fun, I downloaded it. 
Meanwhile - The House is still doing nothing, obstructing, and going on vacations.
Oh, shut the fuck up, you unoriginal prick.
The story was excellent, the rest of the game was okay.  I wanted it to be more like the first game play trailer with Elizabeth fighting guys and conjuring up tornados. 
Bootstrap paradoxes are rather interesting. Especially the ones in Doctor Who. Now there's a show that knows a bit about a Paradox. You see, people assume time is a strict progression of cause and effect but, actually, from a non-linear, non-subjective viewpoint, its more like a big ball of wibbly-wobbly timey-wimey stuff. Another cool paradox (at least I believe this is a paradox)  is when different points in time collide together. Now if a point in time is fixed and if someone (looking at you River Song) tries to change it, a paradox can take place where all of time happens at once. That was a good episode. 
Agreed. Whether it's Pirates or Orioles or NL West or whatever, this shit's getting annoying.  ...that being said, thank god the Giants won today. Finally.
Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reasons:  * You did not include the image's resolution in the title. You should put the resolution in brackets at the end of your title.  For more information regarding these issues please  [see the FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/FoodPorn/wiki/faq), and feel free to resubmit once they have been resolved. Thank you!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23FoodPorn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Hey, I believe it. I think the school system really slacked off in the last ten to fifteen years. 
Probably some kinda internal promo for the employees at Jack Links. I seen something similar at Labor Ready where you could save up the things and buy stupid shit from the company. Funny how people are happy with these things instead of getting a little extra money. An employee has gotta print them out, distribute them and then keep track of who gets what when they turn 'em in.
I drink and smoke tobacco, but I have a few friends I hang out with that do neither. I don't smoke tobacco inside or act like a complete dick when I drink, and they don't hassle me for being into something they're not. Unless someone's gonna act all stoner-straightedge or weed elitist about it, I won't pay much of a second thought to an acquaintance not drinking or smoking cigarettes. 
I dont play terran but i'm fairly certain you will not be able to upgrade stim on 17, and concussive shell on 18.  
you should post your hardware specs.  Mainly the important information: Graphics card or Graphics Chip, CPU and RAM. List your OS too.  Have you tried running everything on lowest graphical settings?
we dont know how life was formed. even a simple living cell is magnitudes more complex than amino acids.  its one thing if simple components were forming but saying "life has formed because some chemicals were colliding" is like saying "this jumbo jet has been assembled because a tornado went through a scrapheap."   its certainly not impossible but requires quite some imagination.
Yeah, up to my mate Scotty so I can go and get it.
Still got to watch it.  I couldn't get tickets for either of the Melbourne games, anyway. I'm back in Sydney in a few days, and I could have got tickets for the last test, but the only ones left were 300 bucks and literally at the very back of the top stand. I'd rather find a pub, so I can see what's happening, even if the atmosphere at the stadium might have been the best in the world.  Maybe in 4 years time.
Will you please try? I understand your vocabulary is very limited and your education sub par but I would really like to know how moving your legs with the sole purpose of going in that direction is more fun than saving the galaxy or killing zombies. 
yea but its quite good right now no ulti can be perfect look at the two globals in the game shen and tf shen can be knocked up and cancelled and tf you see where he lands before he acctually does . Look at the stats on the bonetooth necklace armor pen, cdr, ad , movement , leaprange and longer time on his ulti all stats that help him throughout the game but they are very hard to obtain i mean 14 kills are not a normal score mid game and losing stacks upon death is so much harder to keep . He is a very powerful champion but has trouble to initiate successfully even if they have oricles or pinks if you have more range then an oracle range you can still surprise your enemy . I dont think putting his ulti on a potential reset is the way to go ultamites that go on half cooldown or whatever are when you take nothing from the activation like caitlins ace in the hole if the enemy died before it went off it can go on short cool-down , but rengar would still scout or escape from a potential gank . 
Yep, the red ones are definetely faster. If only they had go-faster-stripes...
Ok cool! I'm very glad to be wrong! I was actually kinda worried about this!   On a side note, that'll teach me to trust ign...
"Wrong on a whole lot of stuff".  Not really a fact, more like your opinion. You seem to be a pro-welfare, anti-death penalty, pro-choice, atheist, anti-capitalist, anti-gun liberal. Some of those I'm okay with and others are pretty shitty and even dangerous positions to have. Segregation is shitty--During my time in Japan I was not allowed into 2 bars because I'm white, so I know first hand. I just shrugged it off because the people inside didn't want foreigners in the bar, and I'm okay with that. The point is, there is NO PROOF that Ron Paul had any knowledge of those newsletters contents. I love how, according to your previous posts there's no way you know for sure that a guy commited a crime, so even after being found guilty by a jury it's not right to give someone the death penalty--And yet with Ron Paul there's very little evidence and you slam him.  You seem to be living in a fantasy world where there is a war between white people and blacks and everyone's a racist. Me? I tend not to concern myself with that kind of stuff. If your a nice guy, you can be my friend. If you aren't, then you can't. 
This is when I realize how unoriginal I am. 
Do we know yet if there will be a return of the platforming missions seen in the first (the sewers with the traditional platforming gameplay)?
Is it worth two life to play a Thragtusk a turn earlier? Or a Huntmaster? Is it worth two life to cast your Hellrider on turn 4 and kill them? Is it worth two life to cast a removal spell that gets rid of the creature that would have killed you next turn?  Is it worth playing the cards to ensure that every single one of your M13/INN lands comes in untapped in a three color deck? Are they not nearly 100% better than gates?  In most cases you play them tapped, sure. But when you have a spell you want to cast, 2 life is a very small price to pay.  Remember that you don't lose until you get to zero life, which, incidentally, is why that Vexing Devil isn't as good as you think it is. Some of the best cards in Magic history have you paying your life away. Check Necropotence, Bitterblossom, Dark Confidant. You could make a case for those as three of the best black cards to ever exist, and they all require you to pay your own life to use.  Remember, life is a resource, not the goal.
VdB is going to have to really rotate players this year and hope Tito does as well. If Xavi plays any more than 30 games this season *and* is a starter in the WC, they have no chance. A fit and rested Xavi may still dominate games. We havent seen that in close to a year.   Iniesta, Busquets, Pedro, Arbeloa all look exhausted. Probably Arbeloas last few games for Spain. Azpi/Montoya/Carvajal should make the WC squad.
You use them for a personal reference.  Anything more reflects on them, esp. if you don't last.
Recently, brazil and argentina. I've been to France, Australia,England, Germany, Spain, China, Hong Kong and in the US New Hampshire, Vermont?, Cali, New Jersey, NY, Conneticut, Florida, Nevada, and Arizona. So I guess compared to other people its not that impressive but it's definitely enough for me. 
I am considering the same thing. I'm not getting up at 3am to watch and also don't have tv. I'm hoping I will find a source with recording I can watch free later in the day.
I would knock your tooth out for lying about knocking your tooth out. 
Time heals all, as does cake and whiskey.
This always happens to me but when you bring W.D. to the doctors. One W.D. would be lying in the air, and the other would be 9n the bed facing the wall
Got stood up today so not good. This shit fucking sucks. 
It was taken in the mid fifties
Come on over, have a real beer and enjoy the tits.
*She pouts.*  This Arrancar woman.....
That sounds like a good deal. He needs to take that advice.
Anyone have an idea what's going on with the soldier in the bottom/middle? I can't tell what's going on with his pants, or another soldier gettin' some snow tail or....
That's a little fucked up
&gt;"She is not to be disturbed." The Unsullied narrowed his eyes, frowning at the repeated intrusion by the dwarf.  &gt;"I understand. I thought you might be thirsty standing guard by yourself. I brought you this wine to make the night pass faster." He held up the wine. The guard took it with thanks, and tilted his head back to drain the wine. Tyrion's bolt caught him in his unprotected neck. The guard dropped to the ground like a mummer's puppet with the strings cut. Blood and wine mixed together before being sucked down into the thirsty Dothraki Sea. *What a waste of good wine,* Tyrion thought, before pulling back the string and notching another bolt.  &gt;"I'll go get some more, my sweet." There was movement in the tent, casting flickering shadows on the cloth walls, and Tyrion stepped away from the entrance. Daario ducked under one of the flaps. He carried an empty platter, and was laughing to himself. But he stopped when he saw the body. "What?" He reached for his sword, but the bolt caught him in the chest before he could draw them. The air whistled out of his chest as the blood bubbled on his leather jerkin. Tyrion stepped over him and into the tent.  &gt;"Back so soon?" Daenerys said. She was naked, lying languidly on the ground, a blanket. She started when she saw him, and clutched the blanket. "Where's Daario?"  &gt;"Wherever whores go." He hefted the crossbow.  &gt;"You killed him." Her expression turned stony. Tyrion shrugged. "You twisted little dwarf."  &gt;"There was a Summer Islander in Robert Baratheon's court, Jalabhar Xho. Every year, he would ask for Robert's help in reclaiming his kingdom, and every year, Robert said, 'Not now, maybe next year.' And the court laughed at him behind his back, because Jalabhar always believed him. I'm done being laughed at." Tyrion put his foot on the bow and yanked, readying it for firing.  &gt;"There's a saying in Westeros," Tyrion said as he loaded a bolt. "'A Lannister always pays his debts.' So you can imagine we don't like it when other people don't do the same."  &gt;"I am the blood of the dragon," Daenerys said icily. "You will die screaming for mercy, with my-"  &gt;The crossbow *twang*ed. Tyrion slung the bow back across his back. He was really getting to be quite a good shot with it. He left her there and stepped out of the tent, past the two corpses. In the distance, the dragons were screaming.
Or ya know....she could be in Europe...
Upvotes for him for the way he presented it without being a douche!
You: "Hey man, your mom seduced jim."  Friend: "Fuck Jim" You: "O and then I jumped in as well"
you never did tell me what you had to offer.
Grace: 3:20ish
Right, for some reason I was thinking that the Chancellor triggers took place before the first turn rather than the first upkeep.
Yah we were always taught that driving tired was way up there with driving drunk on the list of things not to do
I have failed in January. In February. In March. IN APRIL. IN MAY. IN JUNE.  I will not fail again. 
Oh yeah! I forgot until I read your username! The ad was up about a week ago, 30+ Peacock/Assorted African Cichlids, 90 gallon tank, glass top, oak stand, the 48"-60" Marineland reed capable LED, 2 Fluval 300 watt heaters, 2 azoo battery backup air pumps with tubing and airstones (I thought that they were the little cheap Azoo ones, about $10 each until he showed me a picture. They are the $85 new ones, you plug in and the battery included charges while is constantly runs air, then it'll run for about 3 days once the power goes off,) Cichlid Stones, one of those massive 3 piece sunken ship decorations, 12 2' tall plastic plants, gravel and a Fluval FX5 Canister filter (Less than a month old!!!) It's in Newark, and he was asking $600. I told him I'd buy the hardware, but not the fish because I'm going a different route. He has a coworker who is buying the cichlids next weekend (I've gotta wait another week and the anticipation is killing me!) I'm getting the rest for $500, tried to haggle but he was firm. Still, a great deal in my book, considering that the Fluval FX5 alone is like $300 new. 
Shit.
we do not know what would reduce abortion rates. If the availability of oral contraceptives won't do it, nothing will. These people are too stupid to be helped.
[I can take it anyway](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=atxUuldUcfI)
That's the whole point of space invaders and these sights.  Shooting where they are going to be and not where they are.
I see pimping in his future...
&gt;before it was....  .... the '90s?
So.... I am confused cos im pretty bad with sarcasms. The trip was amazing or terrible? 
That just broke my heart. I refuse to accept this but I know it's true. 
That's really cute!  The cat has the perfect eyes for the hat LOL!
Going for a low seed.  I see us starting to show shades of the 04 team. 
Nice
Try Deadpool: Pulp if you can find it. It's kind of like Marvel Noir but not set in that universe and it takes place at a later date- namely the 50's. Cold war era stuff. This version of Deadpool is interesting because he has no powers. He's still crazy, but it's more subdued(not that that's saying much). Plus, I kind of dig the costume.   http://www.amazon.com/dp/078514871X
Around 2/3s of the way through a car's life it still has reasonable trade in value, and the last 1/3rd is a gamble where the car may or may start to have more frequent (and costly) repairs. If you upgrade at that point, you're saving yourself that hassle associated with driving a vehicle until it actually dies.  So I tend to be paying the car off for a couple years, then save the extra bucks while not having a car payment for a couple years, then trade in.  That 130k-200k miles range is for those that can (or have to) deal with it being less dependable.
How exactly did you misrepresent your intentions? I don't think it's fair for her to assume that a guy who takes her home from a club is looking for a relationship. So if you simply didn't state or imply anything about your intentions you're fine.
I get scared that MLG could be selectively making some booths less soundproof so that players that get more viewers like Nani advance more through an unfair advantage. I think people need to consider economic incentives for MLG to give unfair advantages. 
360p? I won't even be able to read the names of the players or see what happens LOL. :|
Just to add, you'll have to be careful when filling this loop if you separate the pumps by a decent distance.  I would recommend picking up two reservoir/pump combos, this would make things both a lot easier and would add redundancy.  You can attach one of the reservoir/pump combos directly to the radiator using something like a [UN Mount](http://www.undesignsbrackets.com/).  To fill the loop, fill the first reservoir/pump (the one before the GPU blocks) and pulse that.  The tubing coming out from the GPUs should ideally be connected to the second reservoir by the radiator, that way the water it will flow directly into it and be above the pump at all times.  This should prevent the second pump from ever running dry, no matter where the radiator is placed.  Once the second reservoir has filled, you can simply continue to pulse both pumps until everything has been filled and bled nicely, should be pretty painless.  Now the issue with that setup is the wiring really.  But considering you want the fans over there anyway, connecting a pump up won't be an issue.  If anything you could just make a long-ass extension cable.  Oh and running the GPUs in parallel would definitely be a good idea.  It takes a bit more pump grunt but that won't be an issue as noise isn't a concern.  It should help to reduce and even out temperatures across all cards nicely.  Just grab an EK parallel bridge for quadGPU setups, easily the simplest and cheapest option given your GPU block choice. As much as I love Crystal link and it's fittings, don't bother here.  They're purely aesthetic and you'd need a lot of fittings for a quad GPU setup.  **Edit:** [Here's the GPU Bridge](http://www.frozencpu.com/products/18975/ex-blc-1423/EK_Terminal_Block_-_Quad_Parallel_-_Black_Acetal_EK-FC_Terminal_QUAD_Semi-Parallel.html?tl=g30c101s873) I was talking about.  As your waterblocks are the new FC design, they'll fit with the FC-Terminal.  They won't fit the CSQ FC-Bridge, however, so make sure you go for the one I linked.
Nothing wrong with considering a different perspective, but some of these are highly dubious:  &gt; What if the ability to menstruate was the prerequisite for most high-paying jobs?   You can flip that:  &gt; What if the ability to menstruate disqualified you from most low paying jobs?  Garbage man, undocumented lawn mower, and oil change shop worker are all examples.   The gender binary seems just as valid.
It wasn't that he landed on him. It's that he threw all his weight into his leg sticking up in the air and it bent it funny.
if Fred hadn't scored 2, Luiz would be MOTM today
In the UK only? Or can Canadians do this too?
OP asked about turning light into sound. 
Couldn't you just have a machine scan a 3d image of the arm and convert it into a model? Don't they already do this with dental equipment for making false teeth? You could just have two machines, one dedicated computer to scan and convert the data into a model and another dedicated 3d printer. 
saw that also. if this is real, am perhaps that truck has broken A/C and there's a generator running in the back of the truck :   how is that AC unit being held in place ? 
Westhoughton reporting :) 
Probably the one time where the Computer prof stapled one of my classmate's arm.
Thanks! I was lucky to even get one picture, there were so many people in there - and I'm sure you remember how small the walkway is.
I never said there was a genetic marker for being left handed... And it turns out I don't have the issue with the motor cortex that was thought to have existed. I just learned everything for the wrong hand and no one questioned it.  I don't think you quite understood the intent of the post.
Gophers. At least 3 times a year.
Never thought of it that way. Its a sad truth.  
BBC commentary is spectacularly pathetic, and agreed
You should post your vids anyway.... you gotta start somewhere. I use a GoPro Hero3 Silver for most of the videos I post, but I've always got either a Top Dawg or Blue Tigers "Black Box" dash cam recording. I use both of those to cover my ass and to capture those unexpected situations.
Real racing is 10s of thousands a year.
But nothing about her being able to read minds?
Well, it gave you some more cup volume than me!
 This link appears to have been removed from /r/politics by either the spam filter or moderators.  ---  [Dewhurst: I’ll pass the late-term abortion ban — and “take action against” those who incited demonstration](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1hduo3/dewhurst_ill_pass_the_lateterm_abortion_ban_and/)  submitted 2 hours ago by: [DonnieS1](/user/DonnieS1) to [politics](/r/politics)  ---  **[Confirm it's missing](/r/politics/search?q="Dewhurst%20I%E2%80%99ll%20pass%20the%20late-term%20abortion%20ban%20%E2%80%94%20and%20%E2%80%9Ctake%20action%20against%E2%80%9D%20those%20who%20incited%20demonstration"&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)** | **[Message the moderators about this removal](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Spam%20filtered%20in%20/r/politics%20%3A%20Dewhurst%3A%20I%E2%80%99ll%20pass%20the%20late-term%20abortion%20ban%20%E2%80%94%20and%20%E2%80%9Ctake%20action%20against%E2%80%9D%20those%20who%20incited%20demonstration&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1hduo3/dewhurst_ill_pass_the_lateterm_abortion_ban_and/)** | **[Post to PoliticalModeration](/r/PoliticalModeration/submit?title=/r/politics%20%5Bspam%20filtered%5D%20Dewhurst%3A%20I%E2%80%99ll%20pass%20the%20late-term%20abortion%20ban%20%E2%80%94%20and%20%E2%80%9Ctake%20action%20against%E2%80%9D%20those%20who%20incited%20demonstration&amp;url=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1hduo3/dewhurst_ill_pass_the_lateterm_abortion_ban_and/)**   |     |  | |     |  | ------------|-----|-|-----------|-----| created: |  June 30, 2013 9 p.m. | |score:  |  1 | first seen: |  June 30, 2013 11:57 p.m. | |upvotes:   |  1 | last seen:  |  [[LIKELY SPAM FILTERED]](/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Spam%20filtered%20in%20/r/politics%20%3A%20Dewhurst%3A%20I%E2%80%99ll%20pass%20the%20late-term%20abortion%20ban%20%E2%80%94%20and%20%E2%80%9Ctake%20action%20against%E2%80%9D%20those%20who%20incited%20demonstration&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1hduo3/dewhurst_ill_pass_the_lateterm_abortion_ban_and/)  | |downvotes: |  0 | missing: |  June 30, 2013 11:59 p.m. | |comments:  |  0 |
Look at homemade drum brake forges. They are cheap and great for small projects. 
Is it a big difference in the 7950 and 7970? I could maybe go for it but it'd be really stretching my budget. 
Legally speaking you have every right not to give blood.  We respect this right every day when we watch those in need of organ donation die while compatible donors stand in the same room.  For your analogy to be consistent we would have to create forced organ donation.  An almost identical parallel is seen with marrow donation.  First, the donor agrees to the procedure.  The recipient prepares by taking a course of radiation to kill the diseased marrow.  Once this is done they *must* get new marrow or almost certainly die (they have literally no immune system).  At this point the donor still has the right to refuse to donate.  Even though it means the recipients death. That's the strength of bodily autonomy.  
Nailed it.
Perhaps you don't understand the (is it American) idiom of "you nailed it" which means that the person gave an answer that the respondent totally agrees with?   FWIW, I was not being an asshole, and not being cynical. I was agreeing with comment you made which was (as I read it) tongue in cheek.   Oh, and you may want to review the definition of cynical. 
Here we go. Anticipating another dinner from hell.
Looked for doubles.
&gt;For me at least witnessing an emotion response from someone will elicit a similar but less intense feeling from me. This seems more prevalent in those that indulge/embrace thier emotions more than restrain/mask them.  You are talking about sympathy, not empathy.  "I feel bad because you feel bad" is sympathy.  "I understand why you feel bad and how you're feelings were hurt, even though my feelings aren't hurt" is empathy.   I have not found any evidence that women are better at either one of those things. When it comes to empathy, some of the response to [this thread]( http://www.reddit.com/r/AskMen/comments/1dvulj/women_of_askmen_yes_you_read_that_right_whats_the/) kind of shocked me. How can you claim women are more empathic when the fact that they aren' the only ones that feel ashamed, insecure, or lonely comes as a surprise to them?
Now, this is a story all about how My life got flipped-turned upside down And I'd like to take a minute  Just sit right there I'll tell you how I became the prince of a town called Bel Air  In west Philadelphia born and raised On the playground was where I spent most of my days  Chillin' out maxin' relaxin' all cool  And all shootin some b-ball outside of the school  When a couple of guys who were up to no good Started making trouble in my neighborhood  I got in one little fight and my mom got scared She said 'You're movin' with your auntie and uncle in Bel Air'  I begged and pleaded with her day after day But she packed my suit case and sent me on my way  She gave me a kiss and then she gave me my ticket. I put my Walkman on and said, 'I might as well kick it'.  First class, yo this is bad Drinking orange juice out of a champagne glass.  Is this what the people of Bel-Air living like?  Hmmmmm this might be alright.  But wait I hear they're prissy, bourgeois, all that Is this the type of place that they just send this cool cat?  I don't think so  I'll see when I get there I hope they're prepared for the prince of Bel-Air  Well, the plane landed and when I came out There was a dude who looked like a cop standing there with my name out  I ain't trying to get arrested yet I just got here  I sprang with the quickness like lightning, disappeared  I whistled for a cab and when it came near The license plate said fresh and it had dice in the mirror  If anything I could say that this cab was rare But I thought 'Nah, forget it' - 'Yo, homes to Bel Air'  I pulled up to the house about 7 or 8 And I yelled to the cabbie 'Yo homes smell ya later'  I looked at my kingdom I was finally there To sit on my throne as the Prince of Bel Air
Nope. They get to a point where they feel self conscious about their own face, and can't go without makeup. Not to mention 90% of teenage girls don't know how to apply makeup properly and it makes them look powdery and plastic at the same time. Ugh. 
Do you regularly trawl the Mayo Clinic for weakened targets?
Thank you, Chase Freedom does sound good to start, and maybe some day I will need something for international trips ;) (never left my city, part of that whole being poor/budgeting appropriately... can't wait to really start living life now that I feel I am safely on the right track!)
if you are going to the southwest, you MUST see the grand canyon!!!! but other then that dont waste your time down here in arizona, just see the canyon, hike it, and leave
I can understand this. I don't see why it's ok the put incredibly gory, unpleasant pictures on cigarettes. They might as well just sell cigarettes packaged inside a pickled lung.
I find that even though I have a partner, guys seem to think that somehow it counts less because she's a woman.  I've got to assume they wouldn't hit on me right in front of my partner or try to get in on our hugs if she was a guy. Nobody pulled that crap when I was with a man. It feels incredibly disrespectful of our relationship and just really really entitled and sexist.  I just tell them thanks but I'm not interested and ignore them.  And then I tell them again until they get the message.  I'm not good at being a bitch but I'm working on it.  Grammar edited for clarity
Can you have two MX entries in your DNS record, or are you saying that you switch the MX record if something goes wrong? If that's the case, wouldn't that lead to lost email during the DNS propagation delay?
I just start drooling and mumbling to myself, while craning my head to see as much as possible. If she confronts me, I stare directly into the nipple and ask her if my rag smells like chloroform. Seems to work for me.
Cigarettes for sure.
The first time in the cage is going to depend a bit on their stress level, but usually it's a good idea to give them at least the first 24 hours to get used to their cage and become comfortable there. After that point, you can take them out and handle them, or keep the cage door open and allow them to come out.  You'll want to tailor your interactions a bit to their level of comfort, and basically try to make every interaction a "successful" one. Success generally means that the rats didn't panic or get to a real stressed state, so if they are fine coming out and being handled but get upset after a minute, try to end the handling session just before that point. Each time you handle them, try to extend the time a little bit longer as they acclimate.  I've also found that it helps if you keep the cage in an area where they can see and smell you, in an area that you're going to be frequently in the house. In a lot of houses, that's the living room where everyone is hanging out, but it might be your kitchen or bedroom too.  Depending on where you are in Vermont, you might be close enough to Maine to visit Mainely Rat Rescue. They are a large rescue group for rats on the East Coast and I've heard a lot of good things about them.
If you've ever tried to catch a train in sydney you'll know it always worse than ours.
Ok, as a chick, i feel bad for your girl. Wow, man. Only blowjobs get you hard?   I'm sure she finds sex with you pretty mechanical. "three strokes up, two down, lick, lick (god this tastes awful, feels demeaning, brings back bad memories, i just don't like it, this really turns me off but if I ever want to have sex I gotta do it,) lick, finally penetrative sex that is enjoyable!   Or, like happened to you, "For Christ sake, I HATE giving blowjobs, but he keeps freakin asking knowing god-damn good and well I hate it. What a jerk! It isn't worth it. I'm done."   Its such a turn-on when a guy starts whining and complaining like a little kid. "What's the big deal?! I haven't asked in weeks!" It's like a 5-year-old whining at the grocery store check-out.   *NEWSFLASH* She doesn't like it. That's probably a big deal to her. You think a clit to the nose is inconvenient, how about a bratwurst down your throat with hair on the end? But you keep pushing the issue - then call it a non-issue. I'd get defensive, too.   Do you trim? Are you clean? Have you asked her *outside the bedroom* why she is uncomfortable with oral sex? Have *you* considered looking for alternatives you *both* enjoy and finding new and different erogenous zones? Instead of treating your girlfriend's mouth like a masturbation toy (predictable, the same thing over and over you know gets you off) try exploring a little. Geeze.  
I think they are ...
Nice one mate!   oh, you're serious aren't you?  Caddy Shack
This show was great. Not too many people and it was completely free which is always a plus. We really must've been standing 5 feet away from each other. [Here's my view of February Air.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qSLmEH-X1Lc)
It's possible, however, I cannot be sure.
Quite possibly one of the worst Bond films ever.
Say what you will, but I'm very pleased with Brazil's style of play. Hard pressing to prevent counter-attacks, fast transition to attack, aggressiveness.   Quite ironic to hear criticism of the teams roughness from people who would typically lament the death of 'good old manly football'.
Your submission has been automatically removed because you are not using a reliable host. Please use one of the hosts listed in the sidebar, thanks.  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Freactiongifs) if you have any questions or concerns.*
yeah, rated for 375#.  Figured I can't lift more than 200, so should be fine :)
Can you tell the story?
If i remember correctly, singed was responsible for Warwick's werewolf state. I believe Warwick requested it and was his master. I'll have to read through all that again before i complete this concept haha
&gt; What do they gain from conflating these different scenarios?  A smug sense of superiority.
You know, there is a dexter subreddit. /r/dexter 
&gt; Thanks Obama!  FTFY
You have the same full name as my uncle.
Still drugs because people don't want to buy  the taxed and regulated drugs. They want the stuff that is more potent. 
You know they can still request it to be blurred right?
Great drum face too.
I do not wear them, they are terrible for the feet and the legs. My mother is a crippled old lady who wore high heels and has severely deformed feet and ruptured Achilles tendons. 
Not immune.
I think I actually said something like that to her too. "Oh right, I'll just ungrow my slut tits since you pointed it out."  That's what got her to go to the fitter with me who confirmed my size (44F then, now more like 44G/H)
Riff Raff makes me laugh my ass off, and I love when I read people saying "rap game X", but I have no fucking idea what it actually really means. Can someone explain it?
Parade participants don't have special permission to do anything that would be illegal on any other day so why? There isn't more nudity than you'd find at a beach or more intimate contact than you'd find at a mall.
Jatt laying down the wisdom about coaches. The NA scene especially needs that kind of structure and specific power in the right hands.
On the CPU I get maximum temps of 60c across the 6 cores and 55c on the package. Monitored from HWMonitor. I have the CPU overclocked from 3.2GHz to 4.375GHz.  On the GPU's I get temps of 29c idle to 60c while gaming. I don't run the GTX 780's overclocked.
This picture is not taking Camden out of context either, it really is this bad every day.  You're lucky to still be alive.
Don't know ask the Asian girl.
Haha sorry but I'm not really comfortable posting my body online.
I leave the bread covered for 20-30 minutes at the beginning of baking so the Dutch oven will trap moisture and act like a commercial steam injected oven.   Once the top comes off the pot, you'll see that the bread is pale.  The next 20-30 minutes of baking will brown the crust.  If you like a darker, crunchier crust, take the top off a little sooner (15 minutes into baking).
Reddit sure knows how to kill a joke with over analysing spelling and grammar.
Rangers win the Stanley cup
Let them franchize in Gaza as people there starve to death according to Arab and Western media.
It's not so much about weed specifically. I wouldn't date anyone who was adamantly anti-weed (let's distinguish between simply a non-ent and someone who is actually anti-weed) because that means they're probably closed-minded and ignorant. 
IIRC Yahtzee doesn't view himself as pessimistic. He rather views it as his duty as a critic to find faults with what he's reviewing, and since people think it's funnier when he's bashing the product, he tends to do that more. One can often hear that he legitimately likes a game even though he's tearing it apart in a ZP review.
Listen to Eminem's Despicable freestyle. I think it answers this question adequately. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=z76-Qxi4Shg
 This link appears to have been removed from /r/politics by either the spam filter or moderators.  ---  [Dewhurst: I’ll pass the late-term abortion ban — and “take action against” those who incited demonstration](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1hduo3/dewhurst_ill_pass_the_lateterm_abortion_ban_and/)  submitted 2 hours ago by: [DonnieS1](/user/DonnieS1) to [politics](/r/politics)  ---  **[Confirm it's missing](/r/politics/search?q="Dewhurst%20I%E2%80%99ll%20pass%20the%20late-term%20abortion%20ban%20%E2%80%94%20and%20%E2%80%9Ctake%20action%20against%E2%80%9D%20those%20who%20incited%20demonstration"&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)** | **[Message the moderators about this removal](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Spam%20filtered%20in%20/r/politics%20%3A%20Dewhurst%3A%20I%E2%80%99ll%20pass%20the%20late-term%20abortion%20ban%20%E2%80%94%20and%20%E2%80%9Ctake%20action%20against%E2%80%9D%20those%20who%20incited%20demonstration&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1hduo3/dewhurst_ill_pass_the_lateterm_abortion_ban_and/)** | **[Post to PoliticalModeration](/r/PoliticalModeration/submit?title=/r/politics%20%5Bspam%20filtered%5D%20Dewhurst%3A%20I%E2%80%99ll%20pass%20the%20late-term%20abortion%20ban%20%E2%80%94%20and%20%E2%80%9Ctake%20action%20against%E2%80%9D%20those%20who%20incited%20demonstration&amp;url=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1hduo3/dewhurst_ill_pass_the_lateterm_abortion_ban_and/)**   |     |  | |     |  | ------------|-----|-|-----------|-----| created: |  June 30, 2013 9 p.m. | |score:  |  1 | first seen: |  June 30, 2013 11:57 p.m. | |upvotes:   |  1 | last seen:  |  [[LIKELY SPAM FILTERED]](/message/compose?to=/r/politics&amp;subject=Spam%20filtered%20in%20/r/politics%20%3A%20Dewhurst%3A%20I%E2%80%99ll%20pass%20the%20late-term%20abortion%20ban%20%E2%80%94%20and%20%E2%80%9Ctake%20action%20against%E2%80%9D%20those%20who%20incited%20demonstration&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/1hduo3/dewhurst_ill_pass_the_lateterm_abortion_ban_and/)  | |downvotes: |  0 | missing: |  June 30, 2013 11:59 p.m. | |comments:  |  0 |
[Me \(right\) and my bf (left) with two of my nephews after we painted fake beards with burnt cork on ourselves.](http://imgur.com/yP6vjbc)  This pic means a lot to us cause it was one of the first times he came home after i came out to my family and also dropped the bf bomb. My family now loves him,  i never been so happy in my life. 
Not sure yet, we will let you know what your opinion is when we get the memo. 
Epic beard.  Also, Ohio represent.
did they win?
There are two aspects of your problem I'd like to address.  First, instead of using recording as a tool to help you get better, you have subconsciously used it as a measure of your self worth. Instead of "Oh, that bit was bad. What can I do to fix that?", the dialog in your head is going "Why has my playing got no soul? I've been playing for such I long time, I've learned this and this and this, it should be there by now..." and so forth.  The solution is to listen to the recording with the attitude of a doctor. Perceive what isn't working right, come up with solutions, and have a lot of compassion. If the doctor involved their ego in any way i.e. it was about them rather than the patient, the doctor wouldn't be able to do their job as effectively. Treat your recordings the same way. Now, this isn't easy to do and takes some practising to listen carefully for mistakes and listen with compassion.  Second, separate practising from playing. When you play, accept and actively love every sound you make. This can't be conditional. It has to be all encompassing. A three year old kid would probably enjoy themselves immensely playing the drums, even though from a technical standpoint it is terrible. Be that three year old kid. Whether you are grooving or not grooving. Whether the kit is tuned properly or badly. And so forth.  This takes a while to get into this mindset, especially if you are into the habit of criticizing yourself every time you play. But if you do this 5 minutes everyday, you'll begin to relate to your instrument in a new way. Heck, you might find yourself enjoying playing again.  I've used these ideas for around 4 months now, and I absolutely enjoy playing the piano these days, even moreso than when I was really obsessed 7/8 years ago. And when I find frustration creeping in, I revisit these ideas and I begin to have fun again.
HOLY FUCKING SHIT. SWEET!
I just wasn't sure what the tiebreak criteria is. lol.  That's awesome, though. Hopefully he returns to Chelsea with good confidence and form!
upvote to help you get started
Cast that shit into the fires of Mount Doom
Mayo Clinic's facebook page posted this today.
smelly
and, incidently, the answer to your question.
Yeah I instantly ignore anyone who talks about a cleanse or removing toxins. 
Less than half of brown recluse bites develop necrosis, and it's actually rather difficult to be bitten by one - they are not a very aggressive spider and typically only bite when pressed up against something. However, by nature of where many spiders crawl around, they tend to pick up ambient bacteria, which can infect the site of the bite.   You are now subscribed to spider factz.
What characters are the best with a keyboard? I wanna see options for my possible main before I buy it.
M60 bus will take you from the airport to 125th and Lexington.  You could then jump on the 6 train and get off at 110th street.
So what is the point of this society?
You know it's bad when managers resort to dark magic.
Villa takes a few more than Xabi.
with like 6% humidity. From my experience, humidity is really what just makes it intolerable.  either way hot is hot and it's terrible without AC. 
No contractions here either :(  I'll send 4th of July labor vibes to you if you send me ANTI 4th of July labor vibes. If she won't come today, she needs to wait at LEAST another week, because I don't want her born on or near the 4th!
What about the likes? Those are okay though?
Banned for playing incorrectly have fun in the tribunal
Same here. Mine's OD with 24k gold lettering :) I've always preferred the 23 over any other Glock. But OP is right, it doesn't get much love in this sub. I wonder why that is. 
All those tremendously hot men? And Ellen Paige... god, she's beautiful. 
Pretty much anything from the Beatles, Rolling Stones, Johnny Cash, Hendrix or Bob Dylan. I think their sounds are quite similar to modern Indie/Folk Rock
I feel like I've just witnessed something beautiful.  I want to believe.
i'd break my arms for that
I guess that lack of control over your own life is the flip side of comfort and privilege. It's not all roses.  I appreciate your considered answers, by the way :) 
Oh buddy, there are a lot of us. Evidence: the porn industry.
We solved this quite easily. Don't allow players to be ranked by your league site's projections. Force them to be ranked alphabetically by default, and if someone wants to autodraft, they will have to at least sort all of the players, and then it's good enough for us. Also makes other people set their rankings, which leads to a much more unique draft.
Haha oh god, people aren't taking this kid seriously, right?
For me, a non blocked Cait's Q.  I love that sound. It's amazing.
Another Mook from SD.....weird.....
[Physical law](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Physical_law)  A metaphysical law is a principle of being.
Also there is that luck bonus. It really is helpful when you are chunk/slab farming!
Holy crap! I've never met anyone who knew where Crested Butte was... except the people who live there, of course. I went there for a high school mission trip to rebuild a church and absolutely fell in love... Absolutely freakin gorgeous! 
Anyone using the term "transsexual" would be "educated" on the matter or banned.
D) All of the above
I read this whole post thinking it was /r/drugscirclejerk, it didn't even click until I read the comments. 
My body is ready.
It is, unfortunately, not going to put much of the raw NPK your canes likely need, though. I would definitely turn some rich matter into the dirt before doing the tea.
In a good chair, with a straight back. 
Opinion is always up for debate. My opinion is that the F10 looks like a fat Ford Taurus with gaudy bodywork, and it's really packing on the pounds at right around 4300 lbs.  I like the rear end of the e60, especially with the LED taillights, and the I like its headlights too. 
"The Americans are identical to the British in all respects except, of course, language." - Oscar Wilde
I live in philly and can't stand seeing people in the fountains. It's trashy as fuck.
Arbeloa had a bad game, Very shaky. 
True, but I'm not saying Asuma's as fast as Haku, I'm saying he could outmaneuver him like Sasuke did.
why not?
Thanks for the heads up.  I walk because I am 280.  The couch to 5k is a 1min jog, 1min walk interval. for the first few week.  I'm not looking to put on a bunch of muscle, my goal is to reduce my weight so that I can improve my cardio.  Luckily for me I have an Olympic regulation track 200 yards from my house.  If I feel off, I can just walk home.
Far, far more so than the recent braindead outings. Sure, they had plot devices like FTL travel and transporters - it was scifi after all - but at least they didn't screw up basic physics like the fact that it takes a long time to travel just from the moon to the Earth.
Petsmarts can't special order fish, they have a set list that gets sent automatically.
Many apartments are going to have crime - that's kind of how it is, unfortunately, having so many people in one small area.  Overall, the La Riv area isn't too bad - I've lived in South Sac, there, Rancho, and now I live on Fair Oaks and Howe (in The Villas, which isn't too far from La Riv).
I'm down to a single open square in my Expedit. I need to get to Ikea again soon, and the question is, do I get a 2x2 to stick in the corner for overflow records I rarely listen to or get another 2x4 to have plenty of long term expansion?  Gosh I love the Ikea Expedit.
I know this was 5 months ago, but found the thread through search.  Can I use the run the Lucky 38 mod when I haven't done the mr house quests/killed him?
Not the most valuable, but my Stronghold Mox Diamond and Ice Age Jester's Cap.
The past few years, I've been working as an instructor at a community summer program for kids. I designed and taught two levels of an elementary math enrichment curriculum, and this summer will be my first doing a middle school class as well (my ideal age group!).  I'd started off working as a counselor there right out of high school, and got offered the job teaching after there was an opening for a math class (long story...). It's been a huge help in practicing how to design my own classroom, rather than working with what I was given during student teaching. I started teaching there the summer before my senior year of college, and I'm going into my 3rd year now, and it's been a huge boost on my resume.  Basically, use the connections you already have to find something. Advertise yourself as a tutor, or see if any local programs are looking for instructors. Be creative and put yourself out there!
Wish I could be there to see Neymar walk into the locker-room for the next barca practice
Continuing the Saint Paul thread! Great day for longboarding (too bad all the best hills are full of traffic).
So no go for the O?
I want to make sure I understand what you're saying. Are you legitimately concerned because the joke stereotypes white people as serial killers?
Context?
Who keeps the Metric system down? 
Mario Tennis Open
I don't know why I keep reading this title as "Sexy Mermaid Jiggling her butt", but I'm confused every time. 
honestly, i have to agree with this :(
Have you not been reading the thread? How else are we supposed to tell who's straight and who isn't?
To be fair, I think if Hyun lead his baneling/ultra army with a few infestors spewing out infested terrans to soak mine shots he would have rolled Polt.
I envy you so much that it is pretty much the same intensity as a strong hatred. 
*Smiles*. Just the salty taste from the sea water.
ha, i know exactly what your saying. Did NOT end well.
Hopefully the UK is doing the same.  The EU is not to be trusted, their interests are not our interests.
This wont help I-5 on an interstate level. The CSA is good at the local level, but I think fails to address what the feds would want generally.
So do you go hunting on a kangaroo and and an ak ? 
Shoulda taken it instead, then.
edit: I'm an idiot.
Pass3s free internet porn accounts..... It actually works
Wins are a misleading stat. DAE SABERMETRICS?
After I filed my thesis I went and... had a frozen yogurt. And my life didn't change all that much, apart from the relief from pressure as you described, until I actually found a new job.  Seems like human nature to me--when there's something that occupies that much of your cognitive energy, you don't think that much about what life will be like afterwards except perhaps to idealize it. Once you get there, I think it's natural to be a bit disoriented and shell-shocked. In a way it's parallel to what veterans report experiencing when they return home from way--albeit, of course, on a much more humble scale.  But hey: congratulations. =)
Yeah, I was thinking we might go with game maker.  Would we be able to sell the game?
Beer before liquor, never sicker. 
Definitely like this better than the clippers trade
Wow, amazing explanations. Um, Ill try to get the link it was todays match in the EU LCS with Diamond prox going Udyr and he had gotten a locket early, and I believe on the other team they had gotten a bulwark on j4 and I don't think gambit had much magic damage other than the zac they had. Heres the link http://euw.lolesports.com/tourney/match/1514 . oh and thanks! Your explanations had made things a lot more clear.
It's not a safe pick. [This article shows](http://thats-offside.blogspot.ca/2013/06/defense-defensemen-and-draft.html?m=1) that defensemen, even defensive defensemen, who don't score at least .4 points per game don't make it to the NHL regardless of how big they are.
Great work!
The Nolan batman trilogy followed plenty of comics. The 'big idea' in each movie was his own though.
Let the market decide. 
The Oilers need to pick Subban with one of their 14 picks.
No, you picked a place based entirely on stereotypes of leftists. You generalize us, and make judgments based on that.  I've done my thought. I've also done my work. Years and years of it, struggling under this damn poverty line. Helping out when and where I can, getting to the top of my class in high school. And when I still can't guarantee success for myself through education because of the cost, that shows what is fundamentally wrong with America. Everyone deserves that chance, but not everyone gets it. And that's why I must leave.
A list article (X number of blanks) is not appropriate for TrueReddit.
I was interested in makeup in high school, and am fortunate enough to have nothing to cringe back on. My "staple" was concealer, foundation, light blush, a soft tawny eye trio from Clinique, brown eyeliner (if any) and mascara. That was the simple look, sometimes I skipped eyeshadow all together, played with different shadow,  or wore a sheer lip color. Now that I'm out of high school I'm more adventurous, but I'm quite proud of my skill and got compliments on it frequently.   However, elementary school I wore a frosted purple sparkle lip gloss that was absolutely horrid. 
Honest question, how the hell else do you level it up? I have steel plate armour from a bandit chief and daedric/glass swords, but a smithing level of 26. 
I'm working on an alt DK with no heirlooms, it's definitely doable as Unholy, anyway.  Wasn't prepared for the verbal abuse for gripping casters to the tank, however. Apparently you can't please anybody. :(
Any suggestion of where to get an 1897 officer's sword restored? I have a battlefield find of one with Victoria's cypher on it. Possibly a Boer War or Sudan find.   Congrats on the commission! Grenadier Guards? or is it another regiment with the grenade cap badge?
http://steamgraph.net/index.php?action=graph&amp;jstime=1&amp;appid=730&amp;from=1344916800000&amp;to=1372564800000  The game is gaining players over time though. The progress has been slow, but it's steady. 
They aren't in stock housings, [they're D2S projectors](https://fbcdn-sphotos-a-a.akamaihd.net/hphotos-ak-prn2/1049187_10151675970632332_1395718908_o.jpg). **The image was altered**, they don't dazzle other drivers from behind or from the other size of the road.   HIDs in stock housings are a huge peeve of mine as well.
West St. Paul, represent!
Just because Batman can prepare, doesn't mean they can't have a conventional fight. It does give Batman extra points, but it doesn't take the other fighter out of his element, or take things from him in favor of Batman. What you're suggesting is we put Batman in a place where he has no idea he's being attacked and he has no way of defending himself. It's not even a fight anymore, it's just a scenario where Bruce Wayne gets murdered
Ha.  Ron Paul.  "Extreme"!  HA!
I don't understand. Could you explain what you mean using an analogy?
i think the kwa usp compact it is 140$
I'm Vince Lombardi's reincarnation, the team is mine FOREVER! 
How... how does that even...
I had my bf do this and I would say about 3 days to a week. 
Most games I've played since the patch there hasn't been any arty. At all.
At least he's done more good for the world than 99.9% of Ayn Rand adherents.
*And I don't want a conversation*
**Ciaphas Cain**] ***  I'll take a Iron pistol, oh and some armour if you've got any.
The success of Daft Punk suggests that Chic and Niall Rodger's back catalogue could do well.  Songs like *I Want Your Love* by Chic and *Spacer* by Sheila and B. Devotion have the kind of groove that could work today.
I feel like these people don't know anything about modern anthropology. Yes, the origins are indeed very problematic (though I hate having to actually use that word)--especially the "stages of cultural development." But it's moved far beyond that and now the majority of it is studying very small subsets of culture, many of them in white-dominated countries. Racism, gender, and sexuality are often the focus: social justice bloggers would actually love anthro if the actually understood what it was and could, you know, argue rationally.  Source: I have a degree in Cultural Anthropology
I will never forgive him for that red card vs Madrid. One of the stupidest things I've ever seen someone do in a Spurs shirt, and yes, I was around when Gomes was in goal.
read the comment.
I'm still a big fan of Trini.  They really should do a reunion episode.  
Yup. I'm used to full on gridlock, so the traffic out there ended up being a tourist attraction for me. And traffic lights on entrance ramps? Mind blowing
i seen one for sale in ireland a few months back! awesome bike!
But thats a, oh fuck never mind. 
I know, it makes me sad thinking it would never be integrated somehow, but it makes sense seeing this is a game marketed to younger players. :/ At least there's the bunny villager named Snake, right? :) I can just hope he moves in one day and then NEVER ALLOW HIM TO LEAVE. EVER! 
Garden State, USA
&gt;Maybe it's time to take a break from pursuing women for a little while. It might do you good to try focusing exclusively on the areas where you're succeeding. Either you can go back to looking for women later, hopefully with your self-worth a little higher, or else you might find someone along the way.  You're very much right. I know I should. I'm just so damn lonely. All my friends have their significant others, but I'm always stuck as the third wheel. I want to get it out of my head, but I just can't.
July 4th through Sunday. Convergence-con.org
Ronaldo's goal against Porto. And no, I'm not saying this is the best goal; but this is one of the best goals I've ever witnessed. 
&gt;**Scouts Code Rule # 11 Subsection b:** Fuck bitches get money. 
I dont think so, all the characters are used to progress the homestead quests, and you say one is dead, so i think you will hit a point where you cant continue, and you may have reached that point.    If you can, i dont know how.
That couldn't make less sense.
Have you tried doing it mechanically with no programming? 
*Block-gasm!*
All of them.
lol "without them"  sure there friend. 
yeh hardly seems fair at times to kill people wielding nothing...
[Higher Ground by Stevie Wonder](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=X00XdLhFLSg) Its got funky bass, upbeat tempo and it's under four minutes. 
DBM, skada, mogit.
Swain's powerful, but he has a relatively short range, and has to get very close to enemy champions for his full burst. He has a lot of lane-clear potential later on, especially with an ultimate with only an 8 second cooldown.  Swain does quite a bit of damage over time instead of one massive burst. So keep that in mind when you use him. Many players get disappointed when they can't Ahri someone down to 0 at point blank.  You'll want to max out his E by level 9, taking a rank in W and Q by level 4. His W is a slow, and does some damage. It's not the most impressive move he has, but it can be useful. Namely to prepare for his W. His W is an AoE root with a high startup. If you hit a target with your Q, you can slow them down enough to prep them for your W, dealing a pretty good amount of damage and keeping them in place for your E if you haven't cast it already. It's important to also note that his E also increases all damage done by Swain to the afflicted target, as long as Swain's crow remains on the foe and damages them over time. It's also his primary source of damage and harass.  His R is amazing for sustain and lane clear, but don't keep it up for extended periods of time. He turns into a giant crow, shooting out several crows that damage the surrounding enemies (requiring you to be relatively close to them to do damage, unfortunately). It does prioritize champions, but the targets are semi-random, so you may be disappointed with the results in a team fight if you want to focus one target over another. But each crow that hits also gives Swain a certain amount of HP back per hit. It can save your life, and increases your move speed. If you need to clear a wave out quickly, dropping his W on a grouped up set of minions and following up with a 2 second R will help to clear it out- if not completely doing so by itself.  His mana costs are, sadly, pretty damn high. His passive allows him to get a certain amount of mana back each time he kills something, so last hitting with Swain is essential to not only farming, but sustaining his lane.  I typically like to build a Tear of the Goddess fairly fast to help me get some more mana as the game goes on. Building that into an Archangel Staff also helps to get some of that extra mana a bit faster, and it keeps him alive a bit longer once it reaches Seraph's Embrace. Abyssal Rod or Rylai's Crystal Scepter both help, depending on the circumstances. Liandry's will also be useful on Swain, as two of his abilities have movement impairing CC.  I also recommend getting a Rabaddon's Deathcap (an obvious choice for an AP caster) and a Zhonya's Hourglass (it can really save your bacon if you decide to run into a group of enemies at a bad time, and the extra armor is nice).  Swain can be a lot of fun, but you might be disappointed in him depending on the roles you regularly play.
You're just mad because you don't even logic right.
Well, let me ask you this: are you currently subscribed to anyone on youtube who has a shitty personality?
It's time to hunt in the JAFARI SAFARI
Shoulda taken Subban just to fuck with Habs and Bruins fans.
Best movie ever. I told my husband next year we're getting a minion as our Xmas tree topper
IT'S NOT GOAT-ING WELL!
oh geeze thank you so much. i appreciate it.
Yep, it shuts down progesterone production which is essential for the development of the foetus up until the 9th week. This is in contrast to "Plan B", which works by preventing ovulation, and in cases where ovulation has already occurred, preventing fertilisation. Plan B thus is not effective after implantation. 
I still love you, I just think you're trolling or naive.
There's a point you reach that you know when games are lost. Dragging it past that point til where you have a slim chance of winning is not enjoyable. There are some games where you can turn it around but that's usually late game, if you are only at 20min in and getting stomped on, there generally isn't much point in continuing. People, i would say Gold elo and better, generally capitalizes on mistakes and continues to do use that foward momentum to take control of the map. Why drag a game on which you have to turtle and slowly suffer a defeat with a very very slim chance of winning.   Other ELO tier players generally make a lot of mistakes even after getting an advantage. Overextending, not warding, 3vs1 or any variant. This pretty much allows the enemy team to come back into the game.  If you are losing by a few thousand gold early game it's alright. Once you hit close to the 10K overall gold difference; your game is pretty much done. It's really hard to make up that much gold unless the enemy team is really stupid. Late game however, 10K gold difference amounts to nothing when most people have near full build.
I however hope a new one like it rises up. Call of Duty was fun when it first came out. Memories of good times in CoD 2-4 still reign dominant in my mind. Maybe this is just because I was younger at the time and only liked if for explosions, but I think it was at one point a game which had some value.
It's definitely a combination of all those things. Hopefully they understand and everything works out for the better. Thanks for the help
So fucking beautiful
Oh god do you want the whole fucking story? If someone jammed on the brakes to stop from hitting a crazy pedestrian do you think I would have found it hilarious? Probably, but that's because you are an idiot.
You're using specific examples where the system breaks down. I agree that sometimes regulations are outdated and need to be changed. But now let's take the fertilization plant in Texas for example, it wouldn't have hurt for them to have someone come in and check how much fertilizer they were holding. There's a lot of other industries like this that need tighter regulation in that way. That costs absolutely nothing to the company and it creates jobs.
I just wanted to say that this is relevant to my interests... A lovely looking steak, and braw tatties. I don't really want to let anyone know, but I think I might have added some other vegetable matter to this (potatoes are an honorary meat as they have eyes) so, I'd probably have added some steamed broccoli, or similar...
[the man is an artistic genius!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=x0Aj1na9r8k)
I loved what Michael Caine said about that role.  
[Looking for these?](http://i.imgur.com/dpN2LQl.jpg)
Super smooth with excellent flavor.
i can appreciate how good they are but personally i really just don't like these bikes
The punishment isn't for the act. The punishment is for getting caught. ;)
TIL: Mall of America is owned by Canadians.
Hmmm...  Dear One Punch,   Hindrances renounced? How do you renounce a hindrance?  I've heard that in the Mahayanna, there is a middle way- samsara on one side, nirvana on the other. We bounce off these two hindrance and find out that maybe a hindrance isn't a hindrance.   I guess a real question is what is a hindrance to you and how did you renounce it?  Thank you!
Thanks for the interesting post! It wasn't all over the place at all.  I'm glad that you were able to distance yourself from all the radical crap.  As you say, a lot of what SJWs complain about are real problems, but they're so lost amidst the vitriol and name-calling that the real message is lost.
Reminds me of the start to 'Deez Nuts' on Dre's The Chronic.  "So daddy if I had nuts on my chin would they be chin nuts?" "He'll n'aww bitch, you'd have a dick in yo mouth!"
i figure this isn't allowed, but i'd try anyways. just like it... if you'd like.
Much thanks! At least I know now
Yeah I consider VNs to be games, and I actually have Narcissu downloaded right now, just never got around to playing it. My friends are watching Clannad now so I was planning on giving that a shot, but I'll look into Air and Kanon as well. Thanks.
Yeah what a fuckin incredible pickup he was.  I thought for sure he was gonna be a dud
Sadly, the last drops of oil are in Africa, and we had better start paying them off now. 
Ah yeah I understand. If you have aches and pains all the time then concrete probably isn't a great idea but if you're only doing ~20mpw then it shouldn't be too much of a strain on your legs as long as you're not running in old shoes all the time. 
I have two.  First and foremost I'd like to defend myself as an avid reader who enjoys all types of genres from children's short stories to lit theory and Viet Nam poetry.  House of Leaves. What a waste of paper. Obscenely convoluted and distracting. I worked hard to make it about 40% into the book before giving in. "But that's when it starts getting good!" you scream, but I'd rather not waste my time with an author who doesn't know how to make an interesting first half.  Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone. The writing itself is absurdly distracting and painfully boring. I stopped 50 pages in and didn't look back until I had seen every movie release. My friends gave me endless amounts of shit for this. Same argument, it gets better. I was really missing out on the great literary work of my generation. Flash forward, late last year, slow overnight shift. I grab it on my kindle and blow through it.  Waste of time.  De gustibus non argumentatum
Being in a sorority, seriously 
TIL: I'm retarded.  My apologies!
Of course, you're speaking from decades of experience serving within these agencies, yes?  Or are you regurgitating what mom, dad, high school and Mr. Bill cartoons taught you? &gt;Wouldn't other countries start to worry that america was able to telegraph every possible situation  You're insinuating countries aren't worried - apparently you don't pay attention to history, politics or current events.  Wait, what am I saying, of course you don't.  Your perception makes that quite clear.  &gt;Wouldn't there be concerns that personal secrets of civilians started to become more and more public  Again, you're an ignorant fool.  To reveal the personal secrets of individuals to the entire public is to blatantly reveal the programs and give cause for their immediate shutdown.  It's been reported time and again, even by public officials, everything is done in total secrecy.  Corporations and private contractors get the info and do what they will with it.  Politicians, judges, lawyers, you name it, can be blackmailed. http://www.mediaite.com/tv/glenn-greenwald-trashes-claims-of-government-oversight-nsa-falsely-claimed-it-cant-give-congress-information/  Again, go use the internet. 
I laughed so hard I spit coffee on my laptop screen because of you, Asks_Politely!
Innocent until proven guilty. He was wrong to say what he said, jokes should never be made about that kind of thing, but he does not deserve to go to prison for 8 years for what he said. It seems we have become so afraid of what people MIGHT do that we are losing sight of what is right and what is wrong. This is complete injustice. No one should be in jail for what someone thinks he might do, It simply shouldn't be allowed to happen. I understand that it is a sensitive topic in the U.S but he just made a joke, no matter how stupid and disrespectful the joke was.
It is actually extremely easy to blind the pilot with one of those laser pointers that you find in a corner store. They have a range of around 2 miles. It is illegal to do this in the US. One of them is extremely distracting to a conventional airline pilot. If you get blinded you can pretty much have the plane fly straight. Now imagine you're flying a helicopter, buildings and trees all around you. You aren't high off the ground. All of the sudden there's 40+lasers all pointed directly at you. 
Also said he was going to get some more aluminum plates for those rusted pillars, and the other patch is just a piece of aluminum bolted on and caulked.
true...goes back to the question he answered as he just wasn't thinking.  Why condoms....
The team getting the player has until the 5th to sign them. Normally there is a condition in the deal giving the team that traded for the rights a draft pick the next year if they are unable to sign the UFA.
Are you sure you're not talking about a thrift shop? A pawn shop is one where the items are either sold outright or put up as collateral for a short term loan and the loan never got paid back so now the item is for sale. I can't think of anyone who would give a loan for sweatpants or wigs. The only time I can think of a pawn shop buying a piece of clothing is if it was like a signed NBA jersey. 
That's not how... god dammit, I fucking hate Reddit during NSA dust-ups.  This place is the goddamn InfoWars of NSA coverage.
You have nothing to apologize for, I understood what you were getting at and I took and take no offence. Enjoy the weekend!
Only when you write my paychecks :P 
Thanks, I think that's useful. I've always wanted to read Pynchon. 
Meanwhile, in Switzerland:  &gt;"What about us?"
Bulletproof on Stock + Apex = buttery smooth (still waiting for IR support and maybe some form of Zoe functionality before switching to an AOSP/AOKP rom).  On a side note, if any of you guys know of a way to dump the Sense lockscreen I might never switch from stock - that extra swipe up before allowing you to enter a code is killing me. 
I'll see what I can do. When I'm done, I'll send you a link so you can post in and reap the karma. I'll need your first-born as a down payment.
Yep...it was the "save through the grass at almost 200 mph".
It's addictive.. much like meth.
taken down :( 
The only ones in the forseable future are in the executive market and the sub-hundred seat market.  Anything bigger runs into the problem of rapidly spiraling development cost and the associated risks.  In order to ever recover the development cost, manufacturers must sell a lot of units.  For airlines to be interested, the plane needs to be profitable per seat, ie. bigger capacity.  But bigger planes cost more to develop and use more energy to get to cruise and so on.  No one has been able to find the sweet spot of profit for both buyer and seller and it likely won't happen anytime soon as long as SSTs are using multiple times the fuel per passenger mile of subsonics. The comparatively very conventional A380 has still not hit the break even point yet and it offers the best seat per mile cost of any plane on it's routes. If form holds and the airline industry doesn't suffer another big hit, the A380 will break even and turn a long term profit but the situation underscores the main issue.  It costs a lot of money and if you guess the market wrong the costs can bury you.
Cole Cassels to Vancouver, I don't know anything about him other than he is the son of Andrew Cassels. Hopefully he turns out to be as good as his Dad..
I've had this happen to me at National in Phoenix too.  I filled it up near my hotel the night before.  It was a 15 minute drive to the airport the next morning, I got charged $24 for gas.
Nope
You're right.  When I look at the old levitical prohibition against wearing cloth made of wool and linen, that's quite a bizarre thing to be a sin.
[not metronome, but tool that lets you convert between bpm and milliseconds](http://web.forret.com/tools/bpm_tempo.asp?bpm=120&amp;beat=4&amp;base=4)
I can't wait for the papers tomorrow to read how Xavi says the stats and possession told a different story.
At this point, I'm no longer affected positively or negatively in any draft pick we make ever since we got Dats and Zetterburg so far down in the draft. Things tend to work out around here, eventually.
Karkat Dies at the End.
You have a firm grasp of the obvious
Hey, it's that guy that promots freaky drug sex.
Saying thank you a lot.  And always kissing goodbye when leaving the house.
Ah that makes a ton of sense now in hindsight. Thanks!
It is a rare name! But no, my reddit name is a combination of my favorite novel character and a girl I really admire :)
[http://i.imgur.com/scuxHON.jpg](http://i.imgur.com/scuxHON.jpg) ^(Here is an Imgur mirror in case the site goes down or you can't reach it.)
I had GD with my first and at 32 ish weeks they were estimating my son at 7 lbs which would have made him huge at birth.  He ended up being 7 lbs 15 oz.  I was induced due to the GD and issues with my blood pressure. I was still able to have a vaginal birth.  I think it just depends on how your body will react to the induction. Ask your doctor to wait to see if you actually start having medical issues before scheduling induction.
Adventure Time is constantly trying to dispel notions of normative sexual identities and fostering in kids the concept of "be nice, treat everyone equally, and do what you want within reason". If you've missed that, you've either not been watching closely enough or you just like arguing on the internet.  But thank you for your eloquent attempt at a response.
You're almost exactly right. Elder Gods threaten to destroy the world, so a world-spanning organisation must complete a ritual sacrifice once a year in line with certain specifications, including the deaths of the horror archetypes: the fool, the virgin, etc. It doesn't matter what monster does the killing, so long as the sacrifices 'choose' their death, and that enough blood is spilled to keep them sated. If the conditions are not met, the Elder Gods get enraged.  Which is when it becomes clear that the entire movie is a metaphor for horror fans and their demands on the genre. We expect certain tropes, we expect escalation year after year, and when the genre gets subversive and doesn't live up to our preconceived notions of a horror movie, we flip our shit.
oh look she is going to drown her puppy, what a terrible person.  As for the rest i like the cute-dreamy looks in the first picture.
Lol yeah what's with all the wall pictures in the other guys cubical. Though it is awesome.
Mean Girls  "You smell like a baby prostitute"
Well, if it is going to happen anyway at least we are primed.
tonights the freaking night brO's, we're getting our first sweep.
You look like a star! That is an awesome shot.
He does now. 
Despite being female... I have the wierdest boner right now...
"She got a big booty so I call her Big Booty."  2Chainz DGAF about birth names.
I'd like my paladin casting a spell having his Challenge Mode Armor "effect" active, that'd be so awesome.  http://us.battle.net/wow/en/character/stormrage/Statillius/simple  video of the "effect" http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XWMpcKISMhQ
If this is a regular guy I don't wanna be average
Rich kids with no supervision get rowdy. Middle class kids with no supervision get stoned. 
I'd definitely be interested in doing something like this. I would love to work out more, but I just can't seem to find something that motivates me. Going to a gym with a bunch of strangers just isn't my forte. I'd love to immerse myself in something other than Wii fit..
Yes because if he thought he would die by pushing the button and was willing to push it anyway to make the world a better place for everyone else, it would prove he wasn't a psychopath, so he should push the button.
oh and now it's optic v impact in the losers bracket.
&gt;When a group is on psychedelics, and someone starts having a bad trip, the bad trip tends to 'rub off' on all the others.   I don't find this to be true always or even most of the time.
wow really? where were you in the crowd? i was pretty much right in front of mike :P
oklahoma
Sometimes that is not sufficient though
If this is real you'd validate it but like everyone else you have a google pictures fetish and I don't speak for everyone but I think we're pretty god damn sick of it.
WSFSB3 has been billed as an athletic offseason training program, no?  Combines strong lifts with lots of specific exercises, so I don't see why not.
I can see how that could've been a crappy thing to do. And I understand that the writers had to cope with a major character leaving for a lengthy time.. But by "punishing" Ed Helms and altering his character in a such a way.. it just didn't make sense for the story.
your texture pack is all ping
dats weed
Waste of a draft pick
I've heard that the surf is really good in Paraguay, but I haven't seen it so  I dont know.
This sentence is false. ^^^*don'tthinkaboutitdon'tthinkaboutit*
I was at that concert, too. It was at the Bronco Bowl in Dallas, and it was about to be turned into a Lowe's. He played "One More Minute" instead.
No witnesses. 
He came in 2nd at WCS, where he lost to Mvp... that's considered slacking?
Sounds exactly like "Got To Give It Up" by Marvin Gaye
haha as if you can claim anything when your going 180 sanics   Nice route also
I don't think there's anything wrong with him. A lot of people harness negative emotions toward certain types of people as we grow older. We don't all have to love everyone. If OP's boyfriend is okay with her and a few other women, he's on his own way towards getting over his past pains. OP, just be supportive of him and continue being awesome to him. He'll be alright.
Blue. At least from this picture, I don't see any green or grey
Did it for ya! Good luck man! 
Oh lord, I know just what you mean. My first playthrough of BL1 was with Roland, and I did every single DLC and the main game with him mainly alone since I had no Xbox Live at the time. So frustrating when I would always die behind a box when I had a turret out up front, and I couldn't do shit because it despawned. ;_;  But GODDAMN that Hellfire was beastly. Even when I was around level 63 with my Berserker in DLC3, I could still easily smite most of the Crimson Lance with a Hellfire from the 30s and a Defiler from the early 40s.
Where do you live? I thought working in a human trafficking taskforce would be awesome but I don't know if there is a specific taskforce for that in the US.
I love The Catcher in the Rye.
Sunday has just got a whole lot better x
Adding you now.
At least you didn't accidentally slap her on the balls, and lose your boner. That would be harder to live with...
You mean my rare and classic car collection? If you're rich you're not a hoarder, you're a "collector". 
or Weiss
It's like Brewster's Millions.  Only funnier.
This is Minecraft. A place where a person can ingest 8 cubic meters of gold and heal themselves with it. EDIT: Units
Yeah, you're going down a dark path if you cut off a friend because of this stuff in your head.  Honestly, it seems like you would be doing yourself a huge favor by not being in a relationship for some time while you have a chance to do some deep inner work and figure out what makes you an amazing person. Once you do that you'll be free to participate in a relationship in which you feel fulfilled and secure, and you'll know that you can provide the same for your partner.  It doesn't seem like you're in a position to do that right now, and that's where all this is coming from.  
Came here to say that. I make my dog homemade treats and had to add garlic because he had a flea problem when I first got him that wasn't being adequately handled with just pills and baths. Garlic supposedly causes anemia in pets but that has been challenged in recent years because of such insufficient evidence, or the effect is only seen if large quantities are ingested. If they don't eat the garlic for some reason (use fresh, not cooked for best/safest results), try brewers yeast in their food. Some people also put vinegar in the water bowls, but I've heard many say that you shouldn't put additives in water as they may become dehydrated if they refuse to drink it due to the taste/smell.
I find your lack of motivation...disturbing.
and how many have you seen him take?
Your 6th grade Math teacher really needs to come take a seat over here...
but then you're always going be asking yourself, "do I want vodka, or... vodka? hmmm"
And Toronto's suburbs are just so natural, contained, well-maintained, responsible and sustainable (hopefully). Even more than care, I want to _live_ in Toronto and be one of its builders. 
Chicken or egg: write content to that people link to it naturally... But if no one sees your content, how can they link to it? Links help you rank but you need to rank to to get organic traction and natural links.... Hmmm
I noticed the enemies in TTAoDK do not do this, too bad they don't fix that for the rest of the enemies.
It's a rough area, but there are a lot of nice restaurants and bars there.  With light rail and better pedestrian/bicycle access, I think it could really improve.
Baseline, done in 10 and some change. Had to sub in dumbbell presses for push ups since I couldn't even maneuver my own bodyweight. Will retest next month on my one-year anniversary. 
[You're all fucking Illegal!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=90U2IqXEvSM) 
Those campaigning will be eager to joust the States over this to gain favour with the public. 
I hear he also cooks. 
I'm sorry, I thought this was a discussion on the behaviour of a portion of West Coast supporters, not any other ferals that support other clubs (mine included).  Scotty Cummings was bang on. We're supposed to be better than that. Is our rationale really going to be that we're avenging other players who were playing for WA clubs?? Really??  "But... But.. They started it Mummy!"  Really?
Once again, you miss the point entirely. It was a thought experiment to show the difference between a right and an entitlement. Of course there are solutions, that's not the point. Think in the abstract. A human right in inalienable. Nothing, not even the collapse of society, economy, or technology, can take them away. Entitlements are there as long as there is the infrastructure to supports them. Rights aren't something that are given when you are able and subject to forfeiture if they lose institutional backing. They have been there since the dawn of humanity.
Or proper stolen dogs who can fight gunpeople.
It's pretty annoying to be trying to shop and the guy working in the store hits on you. Maybe try to confine it to your breaks unless she flirts with you first? 
And they're so well-fed!
Looks like a scene from the upcoming The Matrix 2.
I applaud your aversion to hyperbole. 
Hee hee alright ill have to go to my old house inhibited by my filthy younger sister. I will return.
No, he didn't hit him because he brushed him back then struck him out. Pitchers should be allowed to brush a guy back, because how else do you expect to keep the hitter from leaning out over? Also, about the standings point, the Rays and Tigers have the same amount of wins. But that doesn't matter to the Sox does it? 2011 and 2012 were very good years for you!
Meme: Not Sure Fry  &gt;* NOT SURE IF 16   &gt;   &gt;* OR 46  
It's a tortoise not a turtle, goddamnit 
I think Kyle Gordon will blow Manning's numbers away by his 5th season. You guys don't know him but he was my QB from 7th-11th grade. He hasn't gone into the pros yet but when he does, watch out.
Woo, PvE!
&gt;Human trafficking is such an innocuous term that it doesn't really get the attention it deserves.  Well, that's not really true. If the top comment's about both the seedy stuff and the vanilla stuff because gang will (and do) pick up both. So the topic up there really isn't sex slaves, it's moving people. And when it comes to moving people I don't think you *need* a fancier title than human trafficking because it's not all an atrocity. It's a general term for a reason. Now, if the topic was specifically the seedier stuff then there are sexier, seedier, more specific terms for that like slavery and human sex trafficking.
I think that was unclassy. EDIT: it is one thing to do it as your way of playing and around the midfield, and another totally different thing to do it by the end time and in your box, just for mocking the other team. 
fucking alaska
All right, you caught me - I'm lazy.
Being 15, this gives me hope for the length of my life that i know will be in vain. 
I was the exact same way. I am a big guy so I figured it would take a lot the first time but I never felt it. I realized that I was actually swallowing the smoke instead of inhaling which took me a while to catch on because I have never smoked cigarettes. Hope this helps. 
Uh... Run, don't walk, to a better job with more sane management? Sounds like there is an ongoing conflict. No fun for anyone
In November, I was able to upgrade. I went from an iPhone 4 to a S3. That was on a Friday. That Monday, I was right back there getting an iPhone 5 instead.   I loved the S3, but iPhone's camera can't be compared to! I could get used to everything else but the camera. It was my deal breaker! 
she shall pilot my homeworld mothership.
Croattenham Hotspur part 2
Good luck tonight Birds, but go Yanks!
It turns out that when you stop trying to get rid of thoughts or control thoughts, but juts let them show up, persist, die a natural death etc. it is very soothing idiot. That's why people do it. People don't suffer because of thoughts, they suffer because they try to get rid of thoughts, they don't want the thoughts to be in their heads etc.   You wouldn't know though. You follow the mind control of 'don't separate what you like from what you dislike as if that were possible... The only way that's possible is if you were to eat both what you like and dislike, drink, ride the same bus as etc. actions don't have to be separated--you'll never escape the ordinary mind's 'separating likes from dislikes' mentally. NEVER. 
Yes, I agree with you there. I don't see it as a standard for measuring ones "level" though, so don't worry :)  Probably the title of my post is a bit misleading in that point, it rather refers to the fact that before this whole psychonaut thing seemed a little crazy/made up to me before.
And a hockey stick. 
I baugth Deamon souls when it came out and I'm still lvl 23
I've gotta get down to this hermano guy.
No Subban for us. :(
7th inning meet up?
Legendary   http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561197991905036
Thanks for all the great responses.
Do you have any female starters, preferably Squirtle/Bulbasaur/Chikorita? If not, what about female Elekid? 
Yep, the story checks out
Does anyone know how these Absolutions are fitted? Just curious i've hever seen commandships deployed in that fashion, thats all.
to be honest, when i'm fasting, i like seeing people eat. i'm already hungry, it's not rude and it's not reminding me that i'm hungry. i already know i am. it actually just gives me an idea of what to eat when i get to eat at sunset :)
No that's why people don't talk about it. Although this subreddit is not at all filled with posts about art films they don't usually post about movies like that, there isn't really much to say about them..
If someone is using them for something like a building project or stuff like that and replaced them. It's annoying crafting the haybales back.
IN-VADE
It been bad for me all weekend with the MLG streams. Doesn't matter which stream, what quality, or even what browser I use. Big audio/video stutter.
You don't have to add me, with my life being as busy as it is. I haven't really had much of a chance to get online and do much. But if its not to much to ask i would still like to be able to pop in and say hello every once in a while. =) col_keller
Hey if you guys don't want your rick's i'll take one of your hands..
Yup.  Hi!
I don't care. I have no relationship with whomever created that GIF, there's no benefit whatsoever for me in posting it. 
Now, I don't remember what I've done to upset y'all!
and then they stayed for the delicious home-cooked meals?
300 apm trax
As a straight man that's been to the occasional gay club, they're one of the few places I feel comfortable dancing my white boy dance.
im sorry i dont get it , can some1 explain me it @.@?
I actually have the backer packaged with the 300i and the freelancer as a separate ship.  So I can use the 300i to scout and explore the universe, find trade routes which I can then perform with the freelancer. Should be around 150$ as well.
Besides the parking, this place is bitchin. I love it. The pool and hot tub has been nice and every single little thing needing attention has been addressed that day. It may be different in other buildings, but I am in E right by the creek/lake and bugs have been minimal. Hello neighbor!
Because the words American and cheese don't belong together unless you include the word government.
Also subscribe to /r/radicalizethefourth here
Dammit! I read it wrong every single time in the books and in this thread until I opened the link.
Rinse the heads, take the top tube off, take off the top wick, run hot water over the main wick/coil then dry it off and put the screw the head into the base without the top tube and dry burn until you see the coil glow red evenly, then rinse and reassemble and you should be able to get more life out of them.
That shop is great. They do awesome work there and can do a variety of stykes
aw yisssss
Thank heavens I haven't had that... though the almost-constant pain down my leg (mixed with occasional foot tingling) is very, very old by now. Spinal disc herniations suck.
Do it now. I'm in my 50s and wish I'd done it in my 20s like you could. 
If it's rainbow colored they must be gay, therefore a liberal gaming atheist. 
couldnt even finish it
1. Pick a gun.  2. Learn its quirks (recoil, stopping power, etc.).  3. Limit your play to specific levels/game types, so you can learn typical player movements and such.  4. Work with a squad, because even the best lone wolfs would be even that much better if they utilized teammates. 
Yeah that's super hilarious lol i remember when i found BBV 5 years ago 
I just never understood how he was ever able to manipulate anything without using the force with those Edward Scissorhands style... hands.
No, but you will get grounded.
Well, some of the really high karma guys mod defaults, which I don't, or see gaining karma as a game, where every comment in a high-visibility thread gets a response.  Obviously, I get upvotes for the LoD, but then again, everyone gets to bug the shit out of me for it, so I'd say it's at least PARTIALLY deserved.  If you look through my all-time top comments (at least the ones that show up -- Reddit needs to fix that shit), while some of them are quick one-liners, many are either stories or pretty long dissections of an inaccurate post title. Other times, I go down a rabbit hole because I get curious why something has happened. So, for example, if a Senator votes a certain way and the article is mocking him for it, I might try to figure out *why*. If there's a good reason, I'll write that up.  In that sense, I think I contribute to Reddit and to be really honest, I try to make this a better place. I don't downvote people for disagreeing with me, I don't flame, I don't troll, and if someone leaves me a response, about 95% of the time I respond.  I'd like to think that consistency has helped contribute to my visibility, but who knows? The biggest advantage for me in commenting here is that it helps improve the clarity of my writing.  If I make a comment and it gets hammered and misunderstood, that's my fault and I can learn from it.  I'd say I get more from Reddit than it gets from me, but hey, I try.
props for constantly finding ways of getting us to read your user without resorting to "LOL look my user" 
Drunken booty-calls.
Iman Shumpert was a senior when I was a freshman. It was so fun to watch him dominate.
Will someone vote for a president other than the two parties? No. The Republican might reflect more libertarian principles, but a 3rd party president is still impossible. 
I'm glad Belgium isn't the only country that will see blackouts when we get rid of most of our power production capacity. 
Used to drink a lot, then realized I could abuse drugs, did that for a while. Got clean about 6 months ago from a 2 year adderall abuse. Haven't touched it since don't drink often, but I actually did today.   when I drink now days I don't have the felling of dread as I usually had when I drank some years ago (I used to be pissed and look myself in the mirror and ask myself what I was doing) these days I just drink enough have fun for a while, sober up and leave the place.   edit horrible spelling, I was on my phone, a bit drunk. 
Where's the trophy presentation on?
I think that's incredibly old fashioned and formal.  I would not take it as an offense unless it was meant as one. 
Kiss ran into problems with one of their pyro machines. Thankfully they found a replacement.  http://imgur.com/cfP94Pk
 This link appears to have been removed from /r/news by either the spam filter or moderators.  ---  [Big Brother, Not Snowden or Greenwald, Is The Story](http://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/1hdrc4/big_brother_not_snowden_or_greenwald_is_the_story/)  submitted 3 hours ago by: [SomeKindOfMutant](/user/SomeKindOfMutant) to [news](/r/news)  ---  **[Confirm it's missing](/r/news/search?q="Big%20Brother%2C%20Not%20Snowden%20or%20Greenwald%2C%20Is%20The%20Story"&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)** | **[Message the moderators about this removal](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/news&amp;subject=Why%20was%20this%20removed%20from%20/r/news%3F%3A%20Big%20Brother%2C%20Not%20Snowden%20or%20Greenwald%2C%20Is%20The%20Story&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/1hdrc4/big_brother_not_snowden_or_greenwald_is_the_story/)** | **[Post to PoliticalModeration](/r/PoliticalModeration/submit?title=/r/news%20%5Bremoved%5D%20Big%20Brother%2C%20Not%20Snowden%20or%20Greenwald%2C%20Is%20The%20Story&amp;url=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/1hdrc4/big_brother_not_snowden_or_greenwald_is_the_story/)**   |     |  | |     |  | ------------|-----|-|-----------|-----| created: |  June 30, 2013 8:12 p.m. | |score:  |  46 | first seen: |  June 30, 2013 8:13 p.m. | |upvotes:   |  57 | last seen:  |  June 30, 2013 11:24 p.m. | |downvotes: |  11 | missing: |  July 1, 2013 midnight | |comments:  |  0 |
~~Are Roy, Weiss or Ribeiro free agents?~~ Nevermind, haha.
When you have stabbed him the second time, I freaked out. When he started running, I couldn't stop screaming in fear :S  This is probably personal to me as a drunk guy started chasing me with a butcher's knife when I was like 13. Just happy that he tripped after like 10 seconds.
Which slum was it?
We sometimes do have good gaydar sometimes not so much. With the metrosexual moment we have become much less able to see that people are gay.  With that said I have hit on straight guys for 2 reasons, 1. they look cute and I figure its an open to see if they are straight/gay/bi/etc. or 2. If they look down its a way to give an ego boost. But this I only do with people I think look attractive only because if I start hitting on someone then I don't want to lead them on. 
They would still sell drugs cheaper than you can get at the store I'm sure
[Suck it.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cultural_mosaic)
Dude, he's Dwight. he's gonna get his money/endorsements no matter where he ends up.
**[connorslevin](http://para.ms/reus/connorslevin)**: [^^original ^^reddit ^^link](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/1hccsz/a/catg12u/?catdrde)  yes, a lot of people are still stupid and need to see the train coming straight for them which is getting pretty close now, but still more people need to see before a revolution starts. you can do your part by effectively but modestly talking to people about it and let them know whats happening. if mainstream media isn't going to tell them who is? people like us thats who  
Will?
[Mine](http://i.imgur.com/ESCLonr.jpg) gets the job done.
*Petrificus trombonicus!* 
No, York Peppermint Patty.
Yeah. but c'mon. Anyone with an average IQ can figure out not to pull back on the chopper after the first time it crashes.
EUW, and my friend dosent have the problem, not streamers either
Seriously! I don't know why everyone is all butthurt about it. If you don't want to have anything spoiled then like you said, just stay off the sub.  
You can't change it.  There is no scientific evidence that you can change your sexuality. The only people who think you can change it are religious people who think it is bad.  They are totally wrong though.  There is nothing wrong with you.  There are millions and millions of LGBT people in the world.  It is normal in the same way that being 6'5" is normal.  Most people are a lot shorter than 6'5", but being 6'5" is OK. There is no reason for a really tall person to try and be 5'10". They should just embrace being tall. Yeah, they will have to be careful about walking through doorways, but it isn't the end of the world. And, there are some advantages to being 6'5".  Yes. There are some advantages to being gay. Sure, there is discrimination and shitty people and homophobia and all that crap. But there are some super-cool things about being gay!  It was really hard for me to come to terms with that but there are some really liberating things about it.  I'd suggest trying to get some LGBT friends. I can pretty much guarantee they won't be like the narrow stereotypes you see on TV.  Not that there is anything particularly WRONG with the stereotypical stuff, it is just that you'll see three-dimensional people.  For example, I love Kylie Minogue. I love the Sunday Styles section of the New York Times. I love drag and drag queens.  So those are some of the "effeminate gay male" interests that I have. But I've got a whole lot more going on, that just blows those stereotypes right out of the water. I can shoot a .22. And I'm really accurate. Splitting wood? Girl, you know I got that.  Hiking? Puh-leeze! I walked 2184 miles on the Appalachian Trail last year. I know all about shitting in the woods for months and months.  Don't hate what you are. Love yourself.  "Cause if you can't love yourself then how in the hell are you gonna love someone else? Can I get an 'Amen!'"
[spoilers season 3/ ASOS](#b "The foo fighters would never shoot Robb Stark!")
I thought you meant organs as in the instrument  I was sitting here thinking "why the hell do so many people want, giant church piano's?"
Oh, c'mon.  The PS1 Lasher was *obscene*.  I mean, it was no n00bhammer, but the tower fights against it were ludicrous!  And there was a lot more water in PS1, so the whole 'oh, you need to cross at the bridge?  That's nice, I'll just [humhumhumhumhum] cross right here' led to some problems in fighting the VS.
o7
welcome to the matrix
&gt;Fun is not objective in the least bit.  Are you serious? How could you possibly say that, that doesn't make any sense, OF COURSE fun is objective. Saying it isn't also goes against your previous argument.
[I was making a joke](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0bXB5zyF3TI), I don't really have one. 
How would one ingest Alpha?  And what kind of a dose would actually be a problem?
i'm not sure what it says about me, but this one actually made me laugh. i think if i'd gotten this message i'd probably have responded. ):
It has a really great perspective. I think that it looks a bit washed out from all the white in the fish though. Try using slightly more saturated colours and tinting the white. Other than that, it's a really neat piece. Great job!
Is your doctor a tree?
ever thought of a hobby? i know i considered a few today!
There are many, many better options than Simple.
WHY DON'T WE HAVE THAT FOR CIV 5?!
well are you going to rekindle things with your wife?
"Jesus Christ. I’m 26. All the people I’ve graduated with, All have kids, All have wives, All have people who care if they come home at night. Well, Jesus Christ, did I fuck up?"   - Just can't sum it up any better than that. 
Hello, we meet again :-) I think we were discussing your website on another thread. Still looking forward to seeing it.
That's absolutely the main symptom if being a sociopath. You can be a narcissist without being a sociopath, but you can't be a sociopath without being a narcissist. 
We aught to pursue the same thing in regards to [automation](/r/automate) systems. If we could achieve the same production capacity that we have for automobiles for automated greenhouses, or automated production processes, imagine what we could do. We would be able to radically re-tailor our societies *quickly* as new innovations are had. We could adapt to change rapidly, without any gradient in regards to access. That is to say, we could provide for everyone an equally outstanding lifestyle, and perhaps do away with the notions of class and nationality. We are Earth. We are human. We aught to stand together.
Good catch, that is the one I was thinking of. 
Tetsuo... 
You're right. We all like or dislike movies because we want to be cool and we violently silence dissenting opinion. Thank God there's someone brave enough to stand up for those whose opinions on a movie differ from the cool kids' and who can provide a safe space for people to admit they like a movie. Maybe you can all come together here to form your own cool kids club and then it will be uncool to hate Hatchet II. The tables will have turned!
I'd be okay with this as long as it doesn't impact the re-signing of Bickell. We missed Byfuglien after the 2010 cup, I think we'll miss Bickell in the same way if we don't re-sign him. 
My chemistry teacher in Nebraska.... One day, the class still had several minutes left and everyone was already lining up to leave.  "Look at you all, just like a herd of sheep, blindly following whoever" and a girl responds "I'm not a sheep, I'm a cow! Moo!" Chemistry teacher responds- "OK, in that case, give me some milk!"
I thought I was alone in the universe!
Natural selection works in funny ways.
The problem with that solution is that you can beat a team without beating them on total map count. You can lose 5-3 and yet still advance.
1.  Yes, my son, you are unique, just like everybody else. 2.  Good judgment comes from experience; what we experience is often the result of bad judgment.  
Here is what the linked  meme says in case it is blocked at your school/work or is unavailable for any reason:  #***Not Sure Fry*** &gt;***Post Title:***  *Hispanics? I see tons of cute Asian girls daily, this is how I feel.*   &gt;***Top:***  *NOT SURE IF 16*   &gt;***Bottom:***  *OR 46*  [Original Link^1](http://imgur.com/Zr3q8lG) | [Meme Template^2](http://imgur.com/memegen/create/Zr3q8lG)
Run up the stairs with hands and feet.
So worth making this sub.  Mods are just jealous
I would be surprised if the EU member nations' leaderships did not know this already and were being read in to information gained from the program. 
For the record, I'm a fan of this pick. Lazar seems to fit perfectly into Maclean's 200-foot game, and he seems like a really motivated kid. At #17, you're not gonna get a definite top-6 forward, so I'd be okay with him being a solid third-liner, but I do think he has the potential to surprise people and possibly make it into that top-6.  I'm also guessing this is a sign we'll be trading at least one of our centres in the near future. Seeing as Smith is our current 3rd-line centre, and guys like Zibanejad and Pageau are more-or-less untouchable at the moment, my money is on Zack being shipped out.
Look for the Star Wars Omnibus titles, they gather many issues into a single book.
That is a frighteningly high center of mass. It looks very unstable. I'd be worried if there were kids or pets around at least.
I'd like to work in film production doing camera work and video editing; that sort of thing. I'm not sure where to go for an actual film program in Indiana/Illinois though, as any school I've looked at with one is at least ten grand more expensive than IU, due to the other schools being private.
You're a good friend. 
You can't be permanently broken.  Hit the gym, take a road trip, sign up for some classes.  You're wallowing in self pity. Get out there and show off what you've got and don't bother worrying about them.  If you need a confidence booster, just remember, they're missing out on you. You're not missing out on them.
i had purple train wreck with gigantic indica buds.   it was fluffy and had a strong indica presence.   and it tasted fruity earthy. PURDY GOOD. 
I don't own a toaster. But, the back of my oven doesn't get that hot, even when it's on 475. I don't know what's wrong with your toaster.
Cursing.^^^^^^^^^^fuck
Had a bad stomach virus for about a week. I was waiting in line at a Chinese food place in the mall's food court when it struck me like lightning. I had to fart. I didn't fart. I shit. All down my leg. I was wearing cargo shorts. Flushed my boxers down the public toilet after a 2 minute walk to the bathroom. I don't think more than 10 people noticed though. It sucked.
Sometimes the financing is cheaper on a new car so that it works out that, after you factor in the interest you'll pay, a new and slightly used car are similarly priced.
Yeah, it was just him admitting a bunch of stuff - good thing you ignored it, it doesn't fit your agenda.
I always thought military style swords were so... gaudy. Hideous really. 
Deary, you're only showing your own stupidity here if you think the world is as incredibly black and white as you appear to. I could point out the innumerable examples throughout history of the difference between people who believed in a cause, and people who used a cause to further their own goals, or link you to reams of studies on bullying or racism, but what point to someone who's worldview is so simple that "If someone says something, it must be obviously literally true".
that had me crack up laughing lol 
Some of those cards had a limit of how much you can withdraw per day. 
"what do you mean expired, it says right here it still has two refills!"
YouTube mirror for mobile users: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q42FXIL_fhc
1/2 is ALL about figuring out the table and playing solid ABC poker.  Variance will catch up with you sometimes but it's rare you'll get outplayed if you pay attention.
I'm going out on a limb here, but (Brooklyn indie band) has really made 2k13 a standout year for music. With their vaporware-infused aesthetic and moribund but profound lyrics ("You're just a drug/and I'm addicted," (Brooklyn indie band) sings at one point, tapping into the pulse of a generation narcissistically raised on Facebook and a tanking economy), (Brooklyn indie band) have shown that they're not just another flash in the pan; in fact-- and I might receive downvotes for this-- but I think we'll be seeing (Brooklyn indie band) at the top of a few year-end lists come December. 
I work as a schoolteacher in Japan. I'm a foreigner, so I get exemption from most office drama. It's hard for me to tell what might be interesting for you, so if you have any questions, ask away.
well the OP did weirdly call it "the original". I guess it's also being sold as that. But it's a good copy of the mask, not "the original".
Where is this? Somewhere in Iowa I know. I want a pic next to it. 
Why do people keep posting with the emphasis on hot instead of the word that they should be emphasizing?
Put some (waterproof) buttons through (sealed) holes where the cups go. If a cup is present ring of lights around it?
Okay, I definitely misinterpreted your original comment to be saying that they just weren't at all powerful.  
##This submission was removed due to new moderation policy  You can post again with the image in a self post, *in just 2 clicks*, by clicking this link: [Make it a self post!](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/submit?sidebar&amp;selftext=true&amp;text=http%3A%2F%2Fi.imgur.com%2Fxty90w9.jpg&amp;title=%5BIMG%5D+FB+conversation+about+end+of+DOMA+with+some+Fundies+from+my+past.) (For more info on the new moderation policy, please see [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/wiki/moderation))
It doesnt matter when they occur, you can just respond to them.
Sounds like a good offer. I'm not a fan of the touch cover. Exchanged mine for the type. I think it'd be good for school. Throw Office or Libre Office on there and youll be good to go.   I use the RT for school and it works well for me. 
 This link appears to have been removed from /r/news by either the spam filter or moderators.  ---  [Big Brother, Not Snowden or Greenwald, Is The Story](http://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/1hdrc4/big_brother_not_snowden_or_greenwald_is_the_story/)  submitted 3 hours ago by: [SomeKindOfMutant](/user/SomeKindOfMutant) to [news](/r/news)  ---  **[Confirm it's missing](/r/news/search?q="Big%20Brother%2C%20Not%20Snowden%20or%20Greenwald%2C%20Is%20The%20Story"&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on)** | **[Message the moderators about this removal](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/news&amp;subject=Why%20was%20this%20removed%20from%20/r/news%3F%3A%20Big%20Brother%2C%20Not%20Snowden%20or%20Greenwald%2C%20Is%20The%20Story&amp;message=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/1hdrc4/big_brother_not_snowden_or_greenwald_is_the_story/)** | **[Post to PoliticalModeration](/r/PoliticalModeration/submit?title=/r/news%20%5Bremoved%5D%20Big%20Brother%2C%20Not%20Snowden%20or%20Greenwald%2C%20Is%20The%20Story&amp;url=http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/1hdrc4/big_brother_not_snowden_or_greenwald_is_the_story/)**   |     |  | |     |  | ------------|-----|-|-----------|-----| created: |  June 30, 2013 8:12 p.m. | |score:  |  46 | first seen: |  June 30, 2013 8:13 p.m. | |upvotes:   |  57 | last seen:  |  June 30, 2013 11:24 p.m. | |downvotes: |  11 | missing: |  July 1, 2013 midnight | |comments:  |  0 |
[Rearth Ringke Fusion](http://www.amazon.com/Google-Ringke-Selling-Premium-Package/dp/B00B7QGT6U/ref=sr_1_1?s=wireless&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1372636892&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=rearth+ringke+fusion)
I kind of feel this way about my peers right now. Seriously, you're still in college/working on going back/are poor as fuck and making babies is your priority? Get over yourself. Take a step back and make a plan to procreate when you can afford it. If everyone took this approach there would still be humans, and we wouldn't have quite the overpopulation problem. Also, smarter future people. In theory. 
People will do almost anything to salvage their deeply-held beliefs when threatened.
Honestly, if this is a regular occurrence in AUS, with giant species of spiders, it would be enough reason for me to move Countries. I have an irrational fear of them. Other bugs don't bother me as much but spiders are a deal breaker. 
As far as I know there has been no current talk of it, but I assume weddings will be implemented at some point down the road. After all, weddings in MMO's have been around for a long time.
Haha. How do so many Silicon Valley companies hire out of college then? I was hired by Apple out of college. You are pretty pessimistic.
Cool story, bro.
Take into account the NOS
Just bought some yesterday thanks for reminding me  
I was the same way. I'd always think, "Your belly is massive, it's not like you need to rub it all the time to bring more attention to yourself!" I used to think it was just for attention and another way to get people to look at the belly. Damn was I totally off. I try to recognize when I'm rubbing my belly so to not do it too much, but it is so comfortable, and sometimes I just feel like my baby can feel me rubbing or patting and baby feels comforted. 
i'd contact them anyway, might get another set of bolts from it.  what's the TPI of the threads?
Ya know, I use to completely feel the same. She annoyed the shit out of me. That is, until I saw her act in Les Miserables. It gave me a whole new prospective. 
 its like grudge fucking... you release all your anger and aggression on your partner's genitals. literally beat that shit to death,  effectively satisfying yourself in more than one way at the same time
I didn't watch MLG, im to busy :P
its how i feel with you, though i have no intrest in any sports
This. "English isn't our national language" is more of that mis-information drivel that kids are taught in school like "Paul Revere totally saved Boston" and "America single-handedly struck down Hitler."
Nope. YouTube comments section has that honour.
I hope you've learned a lesson from this
As long as it is still a Federal Holiday and I get time off, I'm good with it
Hahaha.  'Lego Hair'.   Funny.  Ok, maybe I've been living under a rock, but never heard that one.
you think its intense on weed, try eating 25 gold tops; EGO DEAAAAATH.  Personally I've always enjoyed it, but most people don't I think. 
Its an ocean of all of the melted human flesh.
I could probably get you Qtpie's if you still needed his, unfortunately I can't do the same for the others. Good luck and good on you for realizing the importance of doing everything you can for the girl you love. I sure didn't realize it in time.
i have a feeling that OP's girlfriend is much, much uglier than the meme girl
If it works in Street Fighter, I'm sure as hell it'll work here. 
I know that feel bro.  I got arrested for the same shit, and my parents reacted the same way.  
Well there is an assault rifle (can't remember the name) that, when used naturally by a leftie fires spent shells at a decent speed right into their right eye. I'd imagine that has lead to a few deaths.
I was absolutely shocked with the Bertuzzi pick, seems like a complete throwaway of a pick, many talented players were still on the board, its mind boggling. 
"Then you go in for the kill."
Been tapping into my nightmares, I see.
/r/whitepeoplegifs
Great list! Very thorough. I think a lot of us will benefit from this. Thanks for sharing it!
That geforce 630 is reeeaaallllly gonna hold you back. Buy a new video card and a better power supply to ensure it will work with your system. Other than that I'd say your specs are fine for LoL and the occasional gaming. You may have a faulty hard drive or power supply if you are getting horrible performance, because your specs are quite decent.
Maybe even...  One weekend.
&gt;Should I buy GBC Pokemon games at these prices?  I don't understand, what are the prices?
I will say that I can instantly see that Left 4 Dead has waaay more potential than Call of Duty when it comes to Zombie killing, but I do wish they would make the gunplay a little more realistic.
Frankie Goes To Hollywood - Relax  Think of all the attention lady gaga got for doing the gay friendly stuff, then multiply by 2, because these dudes were actually gay. 
I went with 50 books for the year and I've read 25, so pretty much right on schedule.  I've had some fluff in there but I'm still pretty proud of myself.
***Saloon***  ---  Monster! Monster! We don't care about a stupid slavery issue! We just want to go home, **now**!
Derrick Weltz, Thomas Taylor, Travis Kropf, Dalton Vanderbyl, Damian Ryan , Nolan Stoer, and Scott Kemp all play paintball on a competitive level.
Agreed, the trailer made me want to see it more than the intro.... raunchy comedy isn't my thing, but I'm in the minority there.  I threw them $5, it's not much, but I'd like to see the movie if it's made.
&gt;when they are doing something stupid.  To *you*. If I was keen on a woman and she had something like this in her room, you'd better believe I'd seal that deal in a hurry.
neymar is the future.  lol.
quick write that shit down befo you forget son
Was bulking the right move presurgery?  
As a part Croat, as long as they are developing.   Congratulations to EU guys, hammered yet?
Personally, I think a congressman's salary should be the average of the people's he represents.  
Whoever came up with this NEEDS to be fired.
I needed a new one since mine red ringed so it worked out in the end, but yeah I don't be getting a themed Xbox until my day one breaks after warranty and I can't fix it.
I hope OPs friends left without paying.
"Delightfully crap" is an awesome way to describe it. It's like the later Die Hards
It would be outsmitten
I love how stoic and calm he looks after he pulled that off. He could have pulled his pants down and do the helicopter and everyone would just roar and clap with every spin.
If these types of posts are not allowed, please let me know and I'll delete!
you're crazy. I like you, but you're crazy
Mark Marquez is my favorite new rider!
We need a hipster
Pakratt's Valley Trap...  I keep hearing about it but I have no idea what it is. Could someone give me a link to a video showing it off?
They cant spawn on them either. 
It depends where he would live in Calgary, because only in certain areas its flooded. I know because I live in southern Alberta.
That's not really content, though, it's items and a bit of game money.
It will really depend on the region. There are two different dialects in Ecuador that can be pretty different: Andean highland and coastal.
great way to piss off a cyclist!!
I've been hurt by relationships in the past. It always hurts for a while after it happens.  But after enough time passes, I always look back on it and take it as a learning experience.  You can't control what happens in the past, but you can control your future. Why let one experience with one person destroy a part of you forever? 
See this is why I'm so paranoid about my door being closed and locked. Also why I mute and close my laptop every time I leave my room.
No, no. The Sword of Fighting! Because everyone wants a wisecracking sword intent on getting its wielder killed.
I believe the term organic in a true sense of the word (not a watered down version) would exclude pesticides etc  on the  plants.  
Is that typical for software engineers?  I ask as a mechanical engineering major with an interest in programming who's 'only' expecting to make ~$70k out of school.  
I wonder how expensive it is. And wouldn't it be badass if you could buy whatever sword you wanted so long as it wasn't ridiculous? Imagine walking around in a uniform with tensa zangetsu in Bankai form at your side. 
I smell fart. Because I farted. 
This is a good example of the difference art direction can make.  The tap-squash is one of my least favorite sub genres, but this has good art and fantastic music, and that makes it a pleasure to play.  Good work.  One suggestion: I would *love* a mode or even sequel where the bugs enter the screen at the same rate as the tempo of the music.  I'm not talking about turning it into a music game where you get scored on tapping to the beat, but I keep wanting to settle into a groove of squashing to the beat, but the bugs are just slightly faster or slower than the music and my squashing creeps closer and closer to one side or the other.
No wasting time. I was wondering if anyone else had this problem or if it was a one time glitch. Happy mining!!
I prefer drunk history
Claw Catthews  FTFY
WAY too small for a betta.
&gt; After all, a few short years ago people lost over 50% of their savings in the crash.  Hi, /r/personalfinance here. People who lost "everything" in the crash and haven't long since recovered made overly risky bets. Don't invest in company stock or individual stocks, especially in your 401(k) or IRA.  Generally, you want to buy and hold low-cost broad-market index funds for your asset allocation (which you determine based on your age and risk tolerance). This type of portfolio is hands free, allows you to ignore whatever the idiots on Wall Street think the market is going to do this week, and produces the highest expected long-term returns.  For more information, read [Long-Term Investing Start-Up Kit](http://www.bogleheads.org/wiki/Bogleheads%C2%AE_investing_start-up_kit) from the sidebar in /r/personalfinance.
Check out "The Goon."  One of my favs.
I haven't seen too many questionable amazon links on reddit. Probably because I'm usually too broke to consider clicking them and just pass over them. 
See you soon, My name is Kogen, I work on the farm!
I met my online friend on Omegle. First person I was connected with too, so I lucked out. 
JRTs are very analytical. Mine helped me figure out how to fix the anti-lock brake system on my motorcycle. No pics though, sorry.
every guy i've gone after has been straight, no shame. 
I don't know about everyone else but I was kind of disappointed of how it ended. Yea Chamber was a bamf and all but it seems the final fight was sorta quick and no real excitement. The series was good dont get me wrong but it just seemed dull after a while. 
Good thing that he has you.
All of the hardware needed to turn the lights on and off, including the switch so they're not on all the time, are in the altoids tin on the left.
This was mine...dammit. 
Depends on the type of wood and the size of bed. 
Well no shit he likes the show he's posted this to the fucking breaking bad subreddit.
"a forced kiss is not really that bad" - thanks for perpetuating rape culture! It is bad. Yes there are worse things but bad is still bad.
We're they? Well if that's the case I might wait for steam summer sale and just buy normally :P Didn't wanna wait for 2 weeks
He is now. He was pretty average when he was playing for O.L
In hammonton correct?
Spot the phallic object and the skull.  This type of shit should be banned from reddit.
We just had our dog neutered and he came back with his testicles. Closer looks revealed a small incision between the testicles and base of the penis. So he either got a vasectomy or I got ripped off...
I used to do this to people while on E.  Then I'd hug them and wish them a pleasant evening.  Maybe follow it with an "I love you".
♪I'll make a man out of you!
As a woman who is some form of bisexual, I feel the same way. I dig bigger woman, but not so much bigger men and it sucks and I feel like a horrible person. 
I just uses regular tap lukewarm water *I used a body spray that I never used *I sprayed it as soon as I put the drops of nail polish. * about the nail polish, the best advice is just trial and error.   I'm not good at explaining but hopefully this helps :)
Gtr would look really hit in wrb
From what I seen is that it takes a lot of DEX or STR to improve it a significant amount. From 10-50 you'll get 20ish stat points if you get one every other level. Not enough to make a huge dent in any stat and since Stoneskin is a percentage of total HP and just having more HP will mean greater survival I'm just going to go with VIT.
Then you tell them you're buying him food. Don't mention anything about video games.
Even if you don't like the word it still has a meaning and this post completely embodies everything about being beta. Come on man, stop making memes and get the fuck outta there. At least do something to fuck her over in some way, don't just hang around on the chance that the girl will take him back. 
Brainwashing is used everywhere, it's called culture. Most people are unimportant in the grand scheme of things, they don't believe in anything enough to fight for it, which leaves them at the whims of the minority who do care. That's the culture he grew up in.
http://www.reddit.com/r/gameswap/comments/1h06k6/usa_h_tons_of_games_for_ps3_wii_ps2_psx_psp_gba/  Mind checking out my list? Specially for 3&amp;4, but I would trade for all four ideally.
Agree 100% on The Drones. I saw them live earlier this year, best show I've ever seen. I'll check out some others from your list
There's uncharted 2 to play, I got my ps3 for initial d
[New emote,](http://www.mspaintadventures.com/storyfiles/hs2/scraps/JOHNNOOOOOO.gif) our Great Moderator Gods?
You don't really know the meaning of half the words you are using :/  Not tolerating people treating you like crap, isn't hypocrisy :/
Nope! I still think it's weird and pretty much the same as asking me out on a date because I highly doubt he gave me his number for any reason other than romantic/sexual interest. It's fine if **you** don't think it's the same thing, but I do and since I'm the one receiving the number in this hypothetical, he's not hearing a word from me.  To be fair, I'm engaged and have never dated or even had a crush on  anyone who I didn't know for at least a year before hand so that's playing into my view of this situation.
You should be kept locked in.
I think this is an important sociological question. In countries where drugs are exported rather than used, violent crime is far more common. It resembles pre-war-on-drugs organized crime; kidnappings, racketeering, bootlegging, that sort of thing.   The biggest and best markets are probably in violent crime that isn't currently necessary and intellectual property crime. 
I'm normally not a huge fan of the whole singing/rap combo, but this is one of the few songs that does it well IMO. It may be old (though I only discovered it sometime last year), but it's been long enough that since I've heard the song that I don't mind hearing it again.  I always prefer to listen to the music [with the music video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0ZfH7QwSi1I) though. ;)
He's just trolling. Guessing he's trying to rack up as much negative karma as he can.
Florida here. If you travel anywhere in Florida make sure you go down to Key West and St. Augustine. Key West is a very cool beach town with endless things to do. St. Augustine is one of the most historic cities in the country. Two very cool places I recommend you going. 
